ARTS ADVANTAGE Lessons From School Districts That Value GAINING THE ARTS EDUCATION PRESIDENT'S COMMITTEE ON THE ARTS AND THE HUMANITIES and ARTS EDUCATION PARTNERSHIP ARTS ADVISORY COMMITTEE GORDON AMBACH EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR COUNCIL OF CHIEF S SCHOOL OFFICERS WASHINGTON, DC BENJAMIN CANADA SUPERINTENDENT PORTLAND PUBLIC S PORTLAND, OR JANE WALTERS COMMISSIONER TENNESSEE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION NASHVILLE, TN DENNIE PALMER WOLF EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR PACE - HARVARD GRADUATE SCHOOL OF EDUCATION CAMBRIDGE, MA PRESIDENT'S COMMITTEE ON THE ARTS AND THE HUMANITIES HILLARY RODHAM CLINTON Honorary Chair JOHN BRADEMAS Chairman PEGGY COOPER CAFRITZ Vice Chair EMILY MALINO SCHEUER Vice Chair TERRY SEMEL Vice Chair SUSAN BARNES-G ELT ARTS EDUCATION PARTNERSHIP RICHARD J. D Director EASY
TATE
CHOOLS
RAMON C. CORTINES EXECUTVE DIRECTOR THE PEW NETWORK FOR STANDARDS-BASED REFORM STANFORD UNIVERSITY PALO ALTO, CA DIANE FRANKEL DIRECTOR INSTITUTE OF MUSEUM AND LIBRARY SERVICES WASHINGTON, DC DOUG HERBERT DIRECTOR ARTS IN EDUCATION NATIONAL ENDOWMENT FOR THE ARTS WASHINGTON, DC JIM HERBERT DIRECTOR DIVISION OF RESEARCH AND EDUCATION PROGRAMS NATIONAL ENDOWMENT FOR THE HUMANITIES WASHINGTON, DC DAVE MASTER DIRECTOR ARTIST DEVELOPMENT AND TRAINING WARNER BROTHERS FEATURE ANIMATION GLENDALE, CA BONNIE POLITZ SENIOR PROGRAM OFFICER CENTER FOR YOUTH DEVELOPMENT AND POLICY RESEARCH ACADEMY FOR EDUCATIONAL DEVELOPMENT WASHINGTON, DC
LERONE BENNETT, JR. MADELEINE HARRIS BERMAN CURT BRADBURY JOHN H. B RYAN
OTHER ADVISORS ELLEN MCCULLOCH-LOVELL DEPUTY ASSISTANT TO THE PRESIDENT AND ADVISOR TO THE FIRST LADY ON THE MILLENNIUM WHITE HOUSE MILLENNIUM COUNCIL WASHINGTON, DC SARAH HOWES AGENCY REPRESENTATIVE OF THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION WHITE HOUSE MILLENNIUM COUNCIL WASHINGTON, DC
HILARIO CANDELA ANNE COX CHAMBERS M ARGARET
CORBETT DALEY LY
EVERETT L. F
HARVEY GOLUB RICHARD S. G IRENE Y.
H DAV ID URIN IRANO
HENRY HWANG ENSCHEL
QUINCY JONES ROBERT M RITA M ORENO
ANTHONY PODESTA ANN SHEFFER RAY MOND
SMITH
ISAAC STERN SHIRLEY WILHITE HAROLD WILLIAMS FEDERAL MEMBERS DAV ID
BARRAM ILLINGTON ERRIS
JAMES H. B
WILLIAM R. F DIANE B. F JOHN D. H I. M
RANKEL
AWKE,
JR.
ICHAEL
HEYMAN
BILL IVEY JAMES A. J OHNSON
TERRY PETERSON EARL A. P OWELL,
III
ROBERT STANTON HARRIET MAYOR FULBRIGHT Executive Director
ARTS ADVANTAGE Lessons From School Districts That Value
GAINING THE
ARTS EDUCATION President's Committee on the Arts and the Humanities and Arts Education Partnership
Funded by
GE FUND THE JOHN D. AND C BINNEY 
ATHERINE
T. M
ACARTHUR
F
OUNDATION
Additional Support Provided by
NATIONAL ENDOWMENT FOR THE ARTS U.S. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION WHITE HOUSE MILLENNIUM COUNCIL
COPYRIGHT © 1999 PRESIDENT'S COMMITTEE AND ARTS EDUCATION PARTNERSHIP
ON THE
ARTS
AND THE
HUMANITIES
EDITOR/WRITER: LAURA LONGLEY PUBLICATION DESIGN: PETER M. SAK, BINNEY 
PAPER STOCK: MEAD OFFSET ENAMEL, 80 LB. TEXT AND 100 INKS: KOHL MADDEN PRINTING INK CORPORATION COVER IMAGES: PHOTODISC, TONY STONE, AND SWB PERMISSION
LB. COVER
TO COPY, TO DISSEMINATE, OR TO OTHERWISE USE INFORMATION FROM
THIS REPORT IS GRANTED AS LONG AS APPROPRIATE ACKNOWLEDGMENT IS GIVEN
.
THE
THIS REPORT IS PUBLISHED IN ELECTRONIC FORMAT ON WORLD WIDE WEB AT WWW.PCAH.GOV WEB SITE DESIGN: IMC (ISTROS MEDIA CORPORATION) FUNDED BY: BELL ATLANTIC
FOR AVAILABILITY OF PRINT PUBLICATIONS, CONTACT: PRESIDENT'S COMMITTEE ON THE ARTS AND THE HUMANITIES 1100 PENNSYLVANIA AVENUE, NW, SUITE 526 WASHINGTON, DC 20506 VOICE: 202-682-5409 FAX: 202-682-5668 E-MAIL: PCAH@NEH.GOV
ARTS A
GAINING THE DVANTAGE
CONTENTS FOREWORD . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . by Harriet Mayor Fulbright and Richard J. Deasy
PAGE
4
INTRODUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . by Ramon C. Cortines
PAGE
5
HOW
THE
S
TUDY
WAS CONDUCTED . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
PAGE
7
THE S
TUDY'S
FINDINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
PAGE
9
SCHOOL DISTRICT CASE S
TUDIES AND
PROFILES . . . . . .
PAGE
15
ACKNOWLEDGMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
PAGE
87
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
FOREWORD by Harriet Mayor Fulbright and Richard J. Deasy
T
his study was directed on behalf of the President's Committee on the Arts and the Humanities and Arts Education Partnership by Harriet Mayor Fulbright and Richard J. Deasy.
Harriet Mayor Fulbright,
T
his report responds to questions posed by school and community leaders throughout the United States about public school districts that have made competence in the arts as well as literacy one of the fundamental purposes of schooling for all their students.
As Dr. Benjamin Canada, then superintendent in Atlanta, Georgia, and now in Portland, Oregon, put it to us when we first considered undertaking this study: "I want to know what is going on in these districts, how they are doing it, and what effects they see."
Similar questions were framed by school superintendents and school board members we gathered in focus groups at the beginning of this study.
The "hows" that interested them were not only the strategies and practices regarding staffing, programs, and facilities.
They were perhaps even more interested in how these districts developed and sustained arts education in the face of the enormous pressures on them to prove the success of their
"...the presence and quality of arts education in public schools today require an exceptional degree of involvement by influential segments of the community which value the arts..." 4
schools by accountability measures that focus largely on reading, math, and writing.
We believe this report ­ and the database available on its accompanying Web site ­ provide answers to both sets of "how."
It documents some of the best practices used by these school districts to address staffing, program and resource needs.
Yet if there is a single, overriding lesson they teach it is that the presence and quality of arts education in public schools today require an exceptional degree of involvement by influential segments of the community which value the arts in the total affairs of the school district: in governance, funding, and program deliver y. Orchestrating this involvement so that the arts are seen as fundamental to the general education of all students is a task that falls on school and community leadership alike.
This report shows ways it is being done throughout the United States.
Ninety-one school districts are featured in this report.
But hundreds more were identified by state and national education and arts organizations as having outstanding arts education throughout their schools.
We are grateful to the countless individuals in all of the districts who contributed their time, wisdom, and enthusiasm to make this report meaningful to their colleagues across the countr y.
They knew better than we the questions that needed to be answered.
We hope we have recorded their answers faithfully and accurately.
executive director of the President's Committee on the Arts and the Humanities since the spring of 1997, has spent most of her adult life in the fields of education and the arts.
Her administrative experience includes the Congressional Arts Caucus (its first assistant director), the Fulbright Association (executive director), the Center for the Arts in the Basic Curriculum (president), and the Fulbright International Center (president).
Richard J. Deasy, director of the Arts Education Partnership, formerly known as the Goals 2000 Arts Education Partnership, served as assistant state superintendent of schools for Maryland, where he had responsibility for all curricular areas and statewide assessments as well as services to special student populations.
Deasy also served as executive assistant to the secretary of education in Pennsylvania and as president and CEO of the National Council for International Visitors.
A prizewinning journalist covering politics and government at the state and local levels, he was nominated for a Pulitzer Prize for his reporting on housing and urban affairs in the Philadelphia area.
ARTS A
GAINING THE DVANTAGE
PAGE
INTRODUCTION by Ramon C. Cortines
RAMON C. CORTINES, is the executive director of the Pew Network for Standards-Based Reform at Stanford University.
He has been a school teacher and an administrator since 1956.
He has taught at the elementary, middle, and senior high school levels and held numerous positions in public schools, including the post of superintendent for the Pasadena, San Jose, and San Francisco, California, school systems.
Appointed chancellor of the New York City Public School System in September 1993, he served in that position until October 1995.
He has chaired task forces and committees at both the state and federal levels.
He serves on the boards of Brown University, the J. Paul Getty Trust, Scholastic, Inc., Special Olympics, Inc., the San Francisco Symphony, and the National Center for Public Policy and Higher Education.
MAKING THE CASE FOR DISTRICT-WIDE ARTS EDUCATION A WORD TO MY COLLEAGUES: There is a two-day retreat described in this report at which superintendents of each of the school districts in New York City ­ challenged by the redoubtable Maxine Greene ­ decide that it is important for each of them to clarify his or her philosophy of arts education and the specific application of the philosophy that will work in their districts.
The school leaders recognize that they need a vision and that they must be able to articulate the values of arts education to their unique communities.
I have colleagues like those in mind as I offer the following thoughts on making the case for district-wide arts education in public education today.
S
ince the early 1980s, education in the United States has undergone a sea change.
Reformers have come to espouse a systemic perspective, viewing the different components of the education system as fundamentally interrelated.
The challenge for educators is to create schools that help students acquire the knowledge, skills, confidence, and motivation to succeed in the increasingly sophisticated workforce and as parents and citizens.
Because the arts possess the power to play a role in meeting this challenge, an arts education must be fundamental, not incidental.
I consider the arts to be the "fourth R" ­ a basic
component in the curriculum and a basic tool in the school reform arsenal.
But there are legions of people who do not see the arts as either intrinsically valuable or even useful in acquiring "real world" skills or achieving success in the "other basics."
Therefore, making the case for the arts to important constituencies involved in school reform ­ parents, business and civic leaders, other educators ­ is a crucial part of a school leader's job today.
In my experience, the case for the arts is built upon either (1) the intrinsic value of the arts or (2) the value of an arts education's consequences.
Both are valid.
To establish the value of an arts education's consequences, its "real world" benefits, many people point to the wonderful skills and habits that artistic appreciation and production help form.
Indeed, the arts stimulate, develop, and refine many cognitive and creative skills; they contribute significantly to the creation of the flexible and adaptable "knowledge workers" so many business people say will be crucial to the 21st century economy; and they draw upon and draw out the multiple intelligences of students.
On the other hand, trying to answer the question, "Why should we care about the arts?" from the standpoint of intrinsic value is a little like trying to answer the question, "Why should we care about our health?" The arts, like our health, need no calculus of justification.
We engage in the arts, we ought to teach the arts, because this is part of what it means to be human.
The arts are fundamental to communicating and understanding not only ourselves, but others.
Through the arts we learn to appreciate, and even to create, things of
beauty.
We know about the ancient Greeks and Native Americans, for example, by the architecture, poetry, and paintings they left behind.
We, too, will be known someday to future generations by the art we produce and leave to posterity.
I believe that students cannot understand culture, their own or others', without a solid sense of the arts.
There are other important points that strengthen the case for the arts to parents, to business people, to other educators.
Parents are naturally concerned with the basics.
We can explain how the arts are themselves basic and how they contribute to learning the "other" basics.
But we can also tell parents how the arts help develop a young person's character and values, confidence and empathy, respect and tolerance.
If, for example, you are a member of the cast of a play, you have an obligation to learn your lines well.
You have to help pull the performance together.
You can't just ad lib and "do your own thing."
You have to work continued on next page
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
5
toward the goal of the group.
Through the arts, children learn that there is a time for originality and a time for replication, a time to be the star and a time to be a productive member of the group.
The arts help children build a value system in which they learn selfdiscipline and responsibility; they learn to value effort and to get enjoyment and inspiration from its results.
Business leaders tell us they want higher-order thinking skills in the 21st century ­ specifically, critical thinking and nimbleness in judgment, creativity and imagination, cooperative decision making, leadership, high-level literacy and communication, and the capacity for problem posing and problem solving.
This is exactly what the arts help produce.
The so-called "creative arts industry," moreover, is no small thing.
The arts represent six percent of our gross national product, a figure equal to wholesale trade.
In 1990, consumer spending on the performing arts outpaced expenditure on either motion pictures or sports.
Meanwhile, technology is tapping into the arts and incorporating them into ever more sophisticated and stimulating products and processes.
Even now future integration of arts and technology is being shaped in and by our school systems, including several districts profiled here.
How, finally, do we make the case to other educators? We must show, plainly and simply, that an arts education improves teaching and learning.
Educators say they want materials and activities that are "constructivist," that is, concrete and hands-on.
They seek materials that are multi-modal, multicultural, appealing and challenging to the classroom's diverse range of learners.
They look for activities that provide not just one means of assessment but multiple ways to track and evaluate a student's progress.
They want materials that promote critical thinking.
They look for activities that are interdisciplinary.
So what do we know from decades of research? We know that the materials, the activities, the answers that address all these needs are to be found in the arts.We know: · that an arts education contributes significantly to improved critical thinking, problem posing, problem solving, and decision making; · that, as with language and mathematics, the crux of an arts education involves the communication, manipulation, interpretation, and understanding of complex symbols; · that developing fluency in artistic expression and understanding fosters higher-order thinking skills of analysis, synthesis, and evaluation; · that the arts are multi-modal, addressing and fostering the multiple intelligences of students (spatial abilities, for example, develop through drawing and sculpture, mathematical-logical abilities through producing and listening to music, kinesthetic or physical abilities through dance, interpersonal skills through drama); · that the arts develop a person's imagination and judgment, permitting each individual, in Maxine Greene's classic phrase, to create "as if" worlds, places where we see the world afresh.
I know a teacher who edits the school's creative arts magazine.
She teachers her students that a story or poem needs to have what she calls "moment," making the reader pause and reflect on the world.
An arts education is all about developing the capacity for "moment" ­ a seismic jolt that shakes up our consciousness, our old encrusted ways of seeing and doing things.
Research confirms what we always knew intuitively: The arts teach all of us ­ students and teachers alike ­ innovation, novelty, and creativity.
We learn to be wondrous.
We know, of course, that arts education is not the magic pill that will simultaneously reform schools and boost student achievement.
Systemic reform in the 1990s has taught us that improving education will mean paying attention to all parts of the educational system.
But the arts are a basic part of any program of education and crucial to any program of reform.
Again, arts education must be fundamental, not incidental.
What can you as a school leader do to support arts education ­ beyond making the case to key constituencies? Consider these steps: · Join the board of the local arts council.
· Consider the arts background and cultural interests when hiring your next educator, whether you are looking for a music teacher, a math teacher, or a principal.
· Reach out to the local university or college to establish or strengthen a partnership that will enhance arts education.
· Invite local arts groups to give performances or demonstrations at your schools.
· Call a community forum on the arts to discuss recent research on the arts and learning.
Finally, take the time to familiarize yourself with the variety of programs and practices described in this report.
While there are no surefire formulas for success, the vast multiplicity of ways to incorporate the arts into schooling makes it easy for every educator to promote the arts and, in so doing, promote high-quality education throughout our school systems.
PAGE
6
HOW THE STUDY WAS CONDUCTED ll of the school districts considered for inclusion in this report and database were nominated by education, arts, and arts education organizations at the national, state, and local levels using a set of criteria developed by the project advisors and researchers.
More than 500 school districts were nominated and invited to submit documentation for further review.
Some 300 districts responded.
Schools, programs, and students in virtually all of these districts have been honored in recent years for their achievements in arts education.
Reviewers, however,
A
sought districts that over a number of years have been attempting to reach all students and all schools.
Ultimately, the school districts included in this report were chosen because they met this standard and because they were willing and able to commit the time and energy to respond to interrogation by the project team during the two years of the study.
All districts in the study were asked to comment on the major strategies, strengths, and practices which they believe contribute to their ability to teach the arts (see "Participating School Districts ­ in General").
Eight
of the districts were selected on the basis of demographic and geographical considerations for site visits by a team that included at least one researcher and one superintendent of schools.
The purpose of the site visit was to probe and clarify through a series of questions and observations the factors that enable districts to sustain quality arts education system-wide.
Phone interviews and document reviews were used to determine if these factors were at work in the districts not visited.
As a result, the study reports on a general set of findings as well as specific strategies and best practices found in the districts.
Descriptions of the districts in this written report are used to illustrate a major finding, crucial strategy, or outstanding practice.
A complete list of districts nominated for inclusion in the study, including individuals to be contacted in each of the districts, are provided in the database accessible through the project's Web site.
PARTICIPATING SCHOOL DISTRICTS ­ IN GENERAL efore the first interviews were conducted or sites visited, it was possible for the researchers to make a number of generalizations about school districts with strong arts education based upon the 500 district recommendations and the completed surveys and applications of the 300 respondents.
Through data and description, the districts provided information about student performance, breadth and depth of arts education offerings, staffing, access, innovation, community involvement, resources, leadership, and use of guidelines such as local, state, or national standards.
Student Performance: · Many of the districts have students who win local, state, and national awards, including Scholastic Art competitions, regional band competitions, Presidential Scholars in the Arts recognition.
· A few of the districts and their states assess student achievement in the arts.
Breadth: · Most districts participating in the study offer visual art and music in most of their schools.
· Some districts offer theater in middle schools; many offer theater in high schools.
· A few districts offer dance separately from physical education.
· A growing number of districts are expanding, adding, or planning to develop arts and technology and/or school-to-work programs with computer graphics, design, MIDI music composition, video, film, animation, photography.
· Some districts mention special writing courses and activities above and beyond creative writing as part of an English course.
Depth: · Most districts offer a range of sequential arts coursework in their high schools for the developing student.
· The stronger districts begin arts education in the early years; frequently, this is an area of emphasis for rebuilding.
Staffing: · Most districts included in this report had a high percentage of full-time, certified arts education specialists.
· Districts usually have more specialists in music than in other disciplines.
· Stronger districts have specialists in the elementary schools.
· Medium-sized to large school systems with support for arts education usually have at least one district arts coordinator.
· Districts choosing to integrate the arts across the curriculum have a high percentage of classroom teachers using arts techniques.
continued on next page
B
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
7
continued from previous page (NOTE: Districts overcoming great challenges often had a different staff profile.)
Access: · This area is a challenge for districts.
· Some districts made special attempts at outreach to students with at-risk backgrounds and/or disabilities who are often underrepresented in the arts.
· The strongest districts make a commitment to providing a basic education in the arts to every child, usually in the elementary years.
· Districts perceive graduation requirements in the arts as helpful in increasing access and exposure in secondary schools.
Innovation: · Urban and rural districts faced great challenges in offering strong arts education.
· Community collaborations were overwhelmingly cited as a way to overcome those challenges.
Community: · Most districts work with the community to offer and enhance arts education through parent involvement, artists in the schools, and relationships with arts institutions, businesses, and universities.
Resources: · Most districts have a district-level commitment to the arts through apportioned resources.
· Many districts are rebuilding after severe cuts to the arts 15 years ago.
Leadership: · Many districts have school boards and superintendents who have won awards for leadership in arts educa-
tion, such as the Kennedy Center/National School Board Association award.
· Some of the strongest districts have arts-supportive school leaders who have worked for the district for more than a decade.
· District arts coordinators often take a leading role.
Guidelines: · Many districts working on educational reform use state and national standards in the arts to shape their arts education.
· Some districts work to overcome the effects of the "back-to-basics" standards movement that moved the arts to the background, if not out of the picture altogether.
WHO STUDIED THE SCHOOL DISTRICTS
S
even school superintendents and educators provided this study with their knowledge of school districts, administration, arts education, and specific programs across the nation; with their evaluation of applicants to this study and their time and expertise on site visits to the "case study" districts, and with their invaluable review and comment on the final draft of this report.
At the request of the President's Committee and Arts Education Partnership, they also share on the report's Web site (www.pcah.gov) what they feel they personally learned from these school districts.
Dawn M. Ellis, who served as senior project associate, President's Committee on the Arts and the Humanities and Arts Education Partnership, graduated from Yale University and received her Ed.M. in Administration, Planning and Social Policy from Harvard University.
Mary Lee Fitzgerald, senior fellow, New Jersey Institute for School Innovation, received her Ph.D. from Rutgers University.
Previously, she served as New Jersey state commissioner of education.
Nellie King, superintendent of Lackawanna City Schools in New York, received her certificate of advanced study in educational administration at Buffalo State University.
Lane Plugge, superintendent of Grand Island (NE) Public Schools, currently serves as president of the Nebraska Council of School Administration.
He received his master's degree from the University of Nebraska at Omaha, and his Ph.D. from the University of Nebraska at Lincoln.
Warren Newman, owner and private consultant for Livewire Arts, spent three years as the director of the Arts in Education Program of the National Endowment for the Arts, prior to which he was superintendent of South Pasadena (CA) Schools.
He received his Ed.D. from the University of Southern California.
Paul Williams, superintendent of Beachwood (OH) City Schools, received his Ph.D. from Michigan State University.
Currently, he is the chairman of SMART Consortium, a math and science study initiative.
Brent Wilson, professor and head of art education in the School of Visual Arts at the Pennsylvania State University, holds a Ph.D. in art education from the Ohio State University, an MFA degree in painting and sculpture from Cranbrook Academy of Art (1958), and a bachelor of science degree in art and art education from Utah State University.
His most recent book is The Quiet Evolution: Changing the Face of Arts Education (1997), published by the Getty Education Institute for the Arts.
ARTS A
GAINING THE DVANTAGE
PAGE
8
THE STUDY'S FINDINGS PURPOSE PROCESS THE
AND
A CENTRAL FINDING
A
central finding emerges.
School leaders repeatedly affirm:
PURPOSE OF THIS STUDY
IS TO IDENTIFY THE CONDITIONS AND PRACTICES THAT CREATE AND SUSTAIN DISTRICT-WIDE COMMITMENT TO ARTS EDUCATION FOR ALL STUDENTS.
THE
THE LOCAL CONTEXT AND CRITICAL SUCCESS FACTORS
SINGLE MOST CRITICAL
FACTOR IN SUSTAINING ARTS EDUCATION IN THEIR SCHOOLS IS THE ACTIVE INVOLVEMENT OF INFLUENTIAL SEGMENTS OF THE COMMUNITY IN SHAPING AND IMPLEMENTING THE POLICIES AND PROGRAMS OF THE DISTRICT.
The real and metaphorical walls of the school district become "permeable."
A kaleidoscope of small communities composed of individuals and groups from the broader community actively engage with one another in arts and arts education activities inside and outside of the schools.
Their interactions deepen their appreciation for and understanding of the arts and strengthen their bonds.
They form networks that actively promote the importance of arts education in the general education of all students and in the social, civic, and cultural lives of the broad community.
Their influence creates a degree of consensus among the school board, the school superintendent, and major influential segments of the general community that the arts are an essential part of learning.
They work to sustain that consensus using a repertoire of strategies, resources, and skills that can be seen in the case studies and profiles in this report.
T
WHY
DISTRICT-WIDE?
Q
uality arts instruction can be found in schools throughout the United States.
Often, however, these programs reach only segments of the student population.
This study examines efforts in public school districts ­ urban, suburban, and rural ­ throughout the United States to make the arts an essential part of the general education of all students.
All of the districts discussed here have been recognized at the national, state, and/or local levels for the outstanding quality of specific aspects of their instructional programs in dance, music, theater, visual arts, or other art forms.
There are lessons to be learned from each of them.
But what are the factors that make it possible for a district to reach the entire student population, to treat the arts as a subject comparable to math, science, or social studies? To probe this question in depth and to add to the information gathered from documents and phone interviews, researchers visited eight demographically and geographically different school districts.
he specific characteristics of these networks and the consensus that is reached vary in response to local contexts.
Vancouver, Washington, differs in specific detail from Miami, Florida, as will be seen in the case studies.
And while a degree of consensus is the sine qua non if the arts are to be part of the education of all students, other factors must be in place to create and sustain the quality and scope of the district's arts education.
These factors can be stated generally, but the critical lessons again lie in the way they play out in concrete situations.
NOT
ALL ARE PRESENT IN EVERY
DISTRICT, BUT A SUFFICIENT NUMBER OF THE FOLLOWING FACTORS MUST BE AT WORK TO SUSTAIN ARTS EDUCATION IN THE SCHOOL SYSTEM.
ARTS A PAGE
GAINING THE DVANTAGE
continued on next page
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
9
THE ARTS AND "MULTIPLE INTELLIGENCES" Researchers for this study found that Dr. Howard Gardner's theory of "multiple intelligences" has deeply affected philosophies and programs in many school districts.
One district (Vancouver, WA) rearranged its learning framework to reflect many ways of learning and to include the arts.
Another (Redondo Beach, CA) created a technological laboratory which strives to include as many of the different intelligences in its teaching as possible.
Superintendents and school board members referred to the Gardner research as a reason for supporting the arts in their schools.
Again and again, the research team heard, "It's been shown, kids learn in different ways, so we need to be giving them the opportunity to do just that."
The arts, this study's researchers observed, provide multiple ways for students to exercise intellect.
How to Measure Commitment to
ARTS EDUCATION S upport for arts education in school district budgets is obviously an essential factor if all students are to have access to learning in the arts.
Districts included in this report were asked to quantify their annual spending for arts education as a percentage of the total budget or to provide other measures of financial support.
They found it difficult to do so, as they would if asked to do the same for science, social studies, or other school subjects.
Budgeting methods and strategies vary from school district to school district throughout the United States, but, generally, funding for arts and other subjects is encompassed within broader categories such as personnel, facilities, materials, and so on.
The advent of site-based management further complicates the analysis as individual school buildings are often given discretion to
THE ARTS AND INTEGRATION OF INSTRUCTION Researchers for this study noticed that teachers frequently are torn between two competing ways of organizing instruction.
One approach is to think of each school subject as a separate and distinct collection of knowledge best understood, studied, and learned by itself.
Especially at the secondary level, the school day is organized with a specified time for mathematics, music, etc.
The second way to organize instruction is to assume that every school subject has connections to other school subjects and that the best way to learn is by encouraging students to actively examine those relationships.
By providing students with large projects, themes, or problems, educators encourage them to apply complex pieces of knowledge, skills, and inquiry processes from several school subjects simultaneously.
construct their own budgets within general district spending.
Researchers for this report took another approach in assessing the financial commitment districts make to arts education.
They looked for the evidence in numbers of personnel ­ coordinators and arts specialists in particular ­ in the appropriateness of the facilities for arts instruction, in professional development programs for faculty, and in the support for students and faculty to engage with the arts and cultural resources outside of the schools.
Researchers also sought evidence that during periods of budget cutting the arts were treated comparably to other curricular areas.
As would be expected, districts with strong arts education in their schools make these commitments consistently.
Districts rebuilding their programs increase budgets strategically and often incrementally.
On occasion, a major new investment ­ in a new school building or specialized program ­ is a catalyst for a general spending increase for all schools in the interest of fairness or because of a new level of support in the community.
In virtually every district with strong arts education, resources from the community or other sources supplement the regular district arts education budget in the form of grants, contributed services, equipment and supplies and the like.
Personnel in these districts are entrepreneurial in their search for these supplemental funds and, in the strongest districts, treat that quest as a regular part of their professional responsibility.
Fundamental support must come from the regular school district and school budget, but the strongest districts further enliven their programs with these supplemental funds.
ARTS A PAGE
GAINING THE DVANTAGE
10
CRITICAL SUCCESS FACTORS for Achieving District-Wide Arts Education FACTOR: THE COMMUNITY IN DISTRICTS WITH STRONG ARTS EDUCATION, THE COMMUNITY · active parent and community involvement in school arts programs; · interdisciplinary teams involving arts specialists in the development of curricula; · arts faculty involvement in community arts events; · artist residencies; · student exhibitions and performances for community audiences.
cation programs during facility renovation and development.
FACTOR: THE SUPERINTENDENT SUPERINTENDENTS WHO REGULARLY ARTICULATE A VISION FOR ARTS EDUCATION ARE CRITICALLY IMPORTANT TO ITS SUCCESSFUL IMPLEMENTATION AND STABILITY.
S
­
BROADLY DEFINED
AS PARENTS AND FAMILIES
, ,
ARTISTS, ARTS ORGANIZATIONS BUSINESSES, LOCAL CIVIC AND CULTURAL LEADERS AND INSTITUTIONS
­
IS ACTIVELY
ENGAGED IN THE ARTS POLITICS AND INSTRUCTIONAL PROGRAMS OF THE DISTRICT.
FACTOR: THE SCHOOL BOARD SCHOOL DISTRICTS WITH STRONG ARTS EDUCATION PROGRAMS GENERALLY HAVE BOARDS OF EDUCATION THAT PROVIDE A SUPPORTIVE POLICY FRAMEWORK AND ENVIRONMENT FOR THE ARTS
uperintendents interviewed for the study generally credit school staff, key board members, and/or influential community forces with assisting or convincing them to develop a vision for schooling that includes arts education.
But the subsequent actions by the superintendent are vital to sustaining district-wide arts education.
Superintendents in these districts take such actions as : · regularly articulating in writing, memos, and speeches the importance of the arts in achieving the goals of the school district; · appointing highly effective districtwide arts coordinators; · developing a shared understanding with their district arts coordinator(s) of the role of arts education and providing support for implementation; · encouraging education staff to collaborate among disciplines to ensure district-wide initiatives apply to and include the arts; · committing personal time to meeting with the arts education personnel of their district and to representatives from the arts and cultural organizations of the community.
T
he community assists in the teaching and learning activities of the faculty and students, mobilizes and supports arts education through political activity, uses school facilities as community arts venues and provides venues for faculty and student works and performances.
Formal "partnerships" of school and community arts organizations providing arts education programs to students can be found in many of these districts, and the creation of those partnerships is a strategy a number of districts use.
But the pattern of relationships in the strongest districts is more richly textured and involves a wide range of formal and informal interactions among school staff and the community.
School administrators in these districts encourage or support an array of interactions described in the profiles, including:
.
T
ypically, one or more influential members of the board have had personal experiences or education that developed their knowledge and valuing of the arts and use this background to: · adopt written policies that value the arts as equal to other school subjects; · support the development of plans to strengthen arts education, then apportion resources in accordance with the plan; · treat arts education equally with other subject areas when budget cuts are required; · consider the artistic qualities of buildings and the needs of arts edu-
FACTOR: CONTINUITY THERE IS ENOUGH CONTINUITY IN THE SCHOOL AND COMMUNITY LEADERSHIP TO IMPLEMENT COMPREHENSIVE ARTS EDUCATION
.
continued on next page Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
11
any districts examined in this study have board members, superintendents, and/or district arts coordinators who have served in their districts for a decade or more.
Similarly, many building-level leaders have worked in the district or the same school for even longer periods.
Stability in these formal leadership positions is important in pursuing a set of educational goals, while strong community traditions that embrace the arts are important factors in shaping a consensus supporting arts education.
School leaders told the researchers that consensus was a key to continuity.
Superintendents and principals who enjoyed healthy relationships with the board and influential segments of the community had the freedom and time to pursue their educational visions.
Demographic, political, or value shifts in the community produce board and leadership turnover, a major problem in sustaining arts education.
M
Smaller districts often lack resources for a full-time coordinator but add the responsibility to the workload of a district curriculum specialist or an arts educator at a school.
While the approach has problems ­ overwork and lack of clarity among them ­ it is essential in these districts as well.
Effective coordinators play a number of crucial roles and provide several vital services: · They are often the staff member most actively engaged with influential segments of the community that value the arts and are instrumental in nurturing and mobilizing community support for arts education.
· Board members credit arts coordinators with keeping "the arts on the table" during budget sessions.
· They negotiate between board and central office policies and school-level decision making, an increasingly critical role as districts move towards site-based management.
· They often participate with schoollevel leadership in the screening and hiring of teachers.
· Teachers in turn cite the role of district coordinator in facilitating communication among individual schools and in fostering the climate of support for arts education in the community and district.
FACTOR: THE DISTRICT ARTS COORDINATOR DISTRICT ARTS COORDINATORS FACILITATE PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION THROUGHOUT A SCHOOL SYSTEM AND MAINTAIN AN ENVIRONMENT OF SUPPORT FOR ARTS EDUCATION.
Many principals interviewed for the study spoke of early learning or involvement in the arts or of professional development opportunities that helped them to decide to support arts in their schools.
Others were convinced by the effectiveness of arts education in addressing specific issues.
For instance, principals looking to create a thematically focused or interdisciplinary approach in an elementary or middle school have found that art forms can play a central role because of their complex content and range of activities.
Others have found that hard-to-reach students become actively engaged in the arts and, subsequently, in other aspects of the school.
Similarly, parent and family involvement in arts education enhances the overall environment for learning.
For a district as a whole to sustain the successful implementation of arts education for all of its students, a sufficient number of these buildinglevel leaders must personally value the arts or be persuaded by other pragmatic considerations to make them an important aspect of the school.
In view of the national trend to site-based management, this factor is critical.
Recognizing this, district-level leaders in several of the districts studied include arts education in the professional development activities of school principals.
FACTOR: A CADRE OF PRINCIPALS SCHOOL PRINCIPALS WHO COLLECTIVELY SUPPORT THE POLICY OF ARTS EDUCATION FOR ALL STUDENTS OFTEN ARE INSTRUMENTAL IN THE POLICY'S SUCCESSFUL DISTRICT-WIDE IMPLEMENTATION
FACTOR: THE TEACHER AS ARTIST EFFECTIVE TEACHERS OF THE ARTS ARE ALLOWED TO
S
chool board members and superintendents repeatedly affirm the essential role of the district arts coordinator(s) in sustaining strong arts education programs and in keeping "the arts" part of a district's definition of education.
Their first piece of advice to their colleagues in other districts is to hire an effective coordinator.
They emphasized the care with which they searched for "the right person" ­ some tapping a recognized leader among the ranks of the arts teachers, others wooing an outstanding arts educator from another school district.
­ ­
INDEED ARE ENCOURAGED TO IN MASTERY OF THEIR ART FORM AS WELL AS IN THEIR TEACHING COMPETENCE
CONTINUE TO LEARN AND GROW
.
.
T
he study reaffirms research on the role of the principal as the primary instructional leader at the individual school level.
Principals create the expectations and climate in the school building, and their support for arts education is essential.
T
he presence of arts specialists in a district's schools proved time and again to make the difference between successful comprehensive, sequential arts education and those programs in development.
What the study found
PAGE
12
compelling is the vibrancy that teachers who practice their art bring to an already strong program.
Whatever their medium or m´ etier, teachers who also pursue their artistic life repeatedly told researchers for this study that the value placed on the professional quality of their art by school administrators stimulates and refreshes their commitment both to their art and to teaching.
Administrators, in turn, pointed out that the best teachers stay actively engaged in their art form through exhibitions and performances in district and community venues.
In the strongest districts, this commitment to the teacher as artist is reflected in recruitment and hiring practices that include auditions and portfolio reviews to assess the applicant's competence in the art form.
Experienced arts teachers in the district participate in these reviews.
These activities are conceived as part of a general strategy to strengthen school-community ties in support of the district's general educational goals as well as the arts education budget and programs.
Principals told researchers that parents who never come to school for parent-teacher conferences will come to see their child perform, creating opportunities for building relationships important to the school and district.
FACTOR: OPPORTUNITIES HIGHER LEVELS ACHIEVEMENT SCHOOL
FOR OF
LEADERS IN THESE
DISTRICTS PROVIDE SPECIALIZED ARTS PROGRAMS AS PART OF THEIR BROAD STRATEGY FOR SECURING AND SUSTAINING COMMUNITY SUPPORT FOR THE DISTRICT'S OVERALL EDUCATIONAL GOALS
FACTOR: AN ELEMENTARY FOUNDATION STRONG ARTS PROGRAMS IN THE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL YEARS ARE THE FOUNDATION FOR STRONG SYSTEM-WIDE PROGRAMS
.
.
FACTOR: PARENT/PUBLIC RELATIONS SCHOOL LEADERS IN DISTRICTS WITH STRONG, SYSTEM-WIDE ARTS EDUCATION SEIZE OPPORTUNITIES TO MAKE THEIR PROGRAMS KNOWN THROUGHOUT THE COMMUNITY IN ORDER TO SECURE SUPPORT AND FUNDING FOR THEM
.
n the districts profiled here, school leaders employ a variety of techniques to engage the total school community in arts activities that create a climate of support for arts education.
Exhibition spaces and performance venues in the schools are made available to students, faculty, and community artists.
Free tickets are provided to students, staff, and faculty for attendance at community arts events.
One district provided free piano lessons to all district staff.
Others create weeklong festivals of the arts engaging the school and community organizations.
I
istrict leaders advise their colleagues to establish strong arts education in the elementary school years and to begin any rebuilding efforts at that level.
They give several reasons for doing so.
Elementary programs establish a foundation in the arts for all students, not just for those in specialized programs or those who choose an arts course of study in high school.
Moreover, in some art forms such as instrumental music, a long period of time is needed for students to achieve even a basic level of proficiency.
If such instruction is not begun in elementary grades, a district will not have quality programs at the secondary level.
The arts also have proved to be strong components in the adoption of an interdisciplinary curriculum by elementary schools.
School leaders find, too, that beginning programs in the early years builds relationships with parents and community organizations important to sustaining their support for comprehensive arts education.
These leaders advise their colleagues seeking to reestablish strong arts programs to begin with a major focus on the elementary years.
D
istricts examined in this study offered a wide range of specialized programs for students of the arts, including magnet schools, Advanced Placement programs, and summer and weekend programs.
These programs create an environment of excellence that challenges teachers to continue to develop proficiency in their art forms and encourages students to aspire to professional levels of performance.
Students studying the arts in these specialized programs expressed to interviewers their intense pride in and commitment to their work.
They compete for and win recognition in arts competitions at the local, state, and national levels.
Their achievements contribute to community enthusiasm for the arts and a belief in the excellence and quality of the district's educational system.
D
FACTOR: NATIONAL, STATE, AND OTHER OUTSIDE FORCES MANY DISTRICTS IN THIS STUDY EMPLOY STATE OR NATIONAL POLICIES AND PROGRAMS TO ADVANCE ARTS EDUCATION
.
olicies, mandates, and funding from the state or national levels will not of themselves forge the community/ school consensus required for districtcontinued on next page
P
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
13
wide arts education.
But committed leaders in districts examined in this study marshaled such forces to strengthen the consensus to support policies and programs in the schools.
National and state standards for arts education, state education reform movements, federal funding for general school improvement or targeted programs or populations all were used to support and advance the arts education agenda in these districts.
Similarly, support from private foundations has served to stimulate reform efforts in a number of the districts examined.
System-wide implementation, however, required intense community involvement and consensus.
The case studies that follow in this report illustrate the specific ways in which consensus has been achieved and sustained in eight school districts.
They also illustrate how these critical factors contribute to the conversion of consensus into programs and practices.
The lessons from these districts offer practical guidance to school and community leaders in their parts of the country who are seeking ways to make arts education fundamental in their schools and communities.
have developed a number of strategies for allocating new resources, many of them based on stimulating a "bottom up" request for arts education funding from school sites.
Conclusion
FACTOR: CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT SCHOOL DISTRICTS THAT SUCCEED IN ADVANCING ARTS EDUCATION PROMOTE REFLECTIVE PRACTICES AT ALL LEVELS OF THE SCHOOLS TO IMPROVE QUALITY.
N
ot every school district examined in
this report exhibits these factors to the same degree.
But the more intensively the factors occur, the stronger the presence of quality arts education in their schools.
A level of agreement among formal and informal leadership in the community and school on the importance of arts education is essential.
Implementing and sustaining that agreement requires a sufficient presence of the critical success factors to achieve a level of quality that keeps the consensus intact.
The following profiles and case study reports show how this occurs in specific local
W
FACTOR: PLANNING SCHOOL LEADERS IN THIS STUDY ADVISE THE ADOPTION OF A COMPREHENSIVE VISION AND PLAN FOR ARTS EDUCATION BUT RECOMMEND ITS INCREMENTAL IMPLEMENTATION
hile researchers found few districts using student assessments in the arts as part of a formal accountability system, the strongest districts actively encourage the use of arts assessment techniques for improving student, teacher, and administrative performance.
A few districts, for example, use portfolio review for evaluations of principals and teachers as well as students.
Others encourage teachers to set themselves a challenge within their art form that will be addressed and assessed throughout the year ­ composing new music for a choral group, for instance.
What researchers observed in these districts was the disposition to reflect on and improve practice that is central to improving artistic achievement.
.
eaders at the district and building levels repeatedly told researchers that it was important to combine a compelling vision of the importance of arts education with a thoughtful implementation plan that showed how resources would be apportioned over time to reach all schools and students.
The plan established confidence among arts teachers and building-level administrators that resources eventually would be available but that the increases in district-wide support must necessarily be incremental.
Districts
L
Reading the Profiles Factors that have played roles in building a district's strong arts education are checked at the beginning of each district case study or profile.
Statistics provided by the school districts are 1997 figures.
Abbreviations and numbers appear as they are used by districts, e.g. CSD #25 (Community School District #25 in New York City), MSAD #40 (Maine School Administrative District #40), followed by locations.
contexts.
The lessons of this report are best learned by analyzing these districts.
ARTS A
GAINING THE DVANTAGE
PAGE
14
SCHOOL DISTRICT CASE STUDIES AND PROFILES Lessons From School Districts That Value
developing and sustaining strong, high quality arts education district-wide.
THE STUDY'S WEB SITE: WWW.PCAH.GOV
G
ARTS EDUCATION THE STUDY'S AUTHORS profile or case study in no way reflects the importance of a district or the quality of its arts education programs.
In some instances, the profile may simply reflect those features the district wanted to call to our attention.
All of the school systems recommended for this study which participated by providing a complete, written application detailing arts education in the district can be found in the printed report, on the Web site, or both.
Printed case studies and profiles appear alphabetically.
(For a state-bystate listing, see inside back cover.)
Those districts have provided contact information, which is available on the study's Web site, and welcome questions and comments from other school districts.
The President's Committee on the Arts and the Humanities and the Arts Education Partnership hope this study will serve as a catalyst for the sharing of strategies among school districts nationwide.
Both organizations urge school board members, superintendents, principals, district arts coordinators, teachers, and leaders of arts, business, civic, and parent-teacher organizations to contact districts directly to learn more firsthand about
T
here are, literally, hundreds of writers of the case studies and profiles published ­ in print and on the World Wide Web ­ in this report.
Leaders of national arts organizations, chairpersons of state arts councils, state school officers, community members wrote many an eloquent recommendation that found its way into the report text and context.
Superintendents, coordinators, arts specialists, and board members provided articulate, detailed, focused, and sometimes passionate reports on arts education in their districts.
The study's researchers, directors, project assistants, and editor also served as contributors.
In those instances where it was clear which of two or more contributors wrote a particular report or passage, we have quoted that individual.
In other cases, we quote directly from the "district report."
Therefore, while the case study sites were visited by researchers whose observations form the basis for the report, the profiles may reflect selfreporting.
Further, the length of a
aining the Arts Advantage: Lessons From School Districts That Value Arts Education can be accessed at www.pcah.gov on the World Wide Web.
All of the profiles and case studies included in this publication appear on the Web site.
The Web site includes contact information for each district.
In addition, contact information is provided for other districts recommended for inclusion in the study because of a specific aspect of their arts education.
Several other useful additional files are available on the Web site, such as a chart of demographic data on the school districts studied.
The chart has city or county population statistics and ethnic minority percentages; per capita income, education, and unemployment figures; the rural, urban, or suburban nature of the school district; its location in the state and nearest large city, as well as categories of the area's primary businesses and industries.
On the Web site, district information may be accessed by factors studied as well as alphabetically by school district or by state.
FACTORS, STATISTICS, AND A FEW TERMS
T
he study's findings section details the major factors that enable a school district to provide arts education comprehensively throughout all of its schools.
The factors highlighted above each district profile are those illuminated in the text.
Data for this study was reported by the districts.
It was based upon 1997 information-gathering and checked with the districts for accuracy prior to publication.
Names and circumstances may have changed.
continued on next page
PAGE
15
THREE WAYS SCHOOLS
THE
ARTS IMPROVE
1.
The Arts Improve the School Climate.
Schools organized around the arts look, sound, and feel different.
All in all, the climate is different.
The schools the researchers visited were attractive, warm, welcoming, and visually exciting.
2.
The Arts' Comprehensive Tasks Challenge Students.
Arts students, with the help of their teachers, undertake big projects.
They produce a play, present a concert or dance recital, create an Advanced Placement theme-based portfolio, mount exhibitions.
In doing so, students master an enormous number of artistic skills, direct a myriad of aesthetic and expressive qualities toward given ends, and symbolize human behaviors and emotions in a great variety of ways.
In artistic creation, means and ends are continually interrelated.
Each small element is connected to the creation of a complex but coherent whole work.
Students willingly discipline themselves and undertake rigorous practice and rehearsal sessions.
They learn physical boundaries and, in the process, learn to see the boundaries in a world that, to many teenagers, appears to be without them.
Students also learn to ration their time.
They carry the discipline required in arts making to the discipline of study.
3.
The Arts Turn Schools Into Communities.
Wherever the research teams went in arts-based schools, they were greeted by smiles.
Students, teachers, administrators said, "We are like a family."
"We support one another."
"This is our place."
The occupants of artscentered schools see themselves as members of communities ­ communities that they have a role in creating and sustaining.
They are able to capitalize on the fact that the arts encourage students and faculty members to work together, to create things together, to perform together, to display the results of their efforts together.
Teachers are continually modeling their skills, revealing their interpretations, insights, and judgments to the younger members of these arts communities.
The arts transform learning and schools.
­ Brent Wilson, Ph.D
Among the terms used in the profiles and case study are these: · Arts enrollment is the number of students enrolled in arts course(s) annually.
· Arts magnet schools: Some schools discussed in this study have special arts focuses.
Designated as arts magnets, many of these schools were organized during the 1970s to attract students from across school neighborhood boundaries (Miami, FL; Milwaukee, WI).
In recent years, however, new arts magnet schools have been developed, not to balance ethnic and economic diversity across a school system, but to take advantage of the unique contributions that the arts make to students' education (Greenville, SC; Vancouver, WA).
Arts magnet schools exist at all three levels: elementary, middle, and high school.
Some arts magnets are highly selective, admitting only those students who successfully audition or present outstanding portfolios.
Other arts magnets admit students on a first-come, first-admitted basis or on the basis of interest.
· Artist residency programs: Many, if not all, of the districts studied had residency programs, but in general these programs were designed to enrich basic K-12 arts education.
School officials agree that arts residency programs cannot replace balanced, comprehensive, sequential arts education taught by certified arts specialists.
· Arts specialists are teachers hired specifically to teach a particular art discipline.
(In those cases in which a teacher teaches two subjects, the arts discipline is the primary subject of instruction.)
· Discipline-Based Arts Education (DBAE): Educators who take the DBAE approach, developed by the Getty Education Institute for the Arts, integrate content from the four disciplines that contribute to the creation, understanding, and appreciation of art: ½ making art (art production);
½ responding to and making judgments about the properties and qualities that exist in visual forms (art criticism); ½ acquiring knowledge about the contributions artists and art make to culture and society (art history); and ½ understanding the nature, meaning, and value of art (aesthetics).
­ From Getty Education Institute for the Arts · District arts education budget includes salary, materials, resources, space, travel spent annually on arts education.
It does not include capital expenditures unless otherwise noted.
(See "How to Measure Commitment to Arts Education" in the preceding section.)
· Infusion of the arts into the curriculum...
· Integration of the arts into/across/ through/throughout the curriculum...
· Interdisciplinary approach to arts education...
The phrases above are currently in use nationwide to describe approaches to curriculum and the teaching of the arts.
"Infusion" (as in "arts-infused" curriculum) is used less often today than it was in the early 1990s.
The term still communicates the "pouring of the arts into" a basic curriculum where the presence of the arts might have been missing altogether.
"Integration" conveys the creation of a "whole" curriculum by the bringing together of several subjects and disciplines.
The degree to which the arts and other curricular areas such as mathematics, science, or social studies are brought together and "integrated" usually can be ascertained from the context of each profile or case study.
"Interdisciplinary" in relation to arts education is used primarily to describe either cooperation between arts teachers of different genres, such as music and visual art, or cooperation between teachers of different curricular areas, such as music and mathematics.
Again, context is key.
PAGE
16
ARTS A
GAINING THE DVANTAGE
SCHOOL DISTRICT CASE STUDIES A Case Study:
nonexistent.
The flowering of the arts in CSD #25, not to mention the second highest reading and mathematics standardized test scores for a district in the New York City public school system, can be credited to an involved community, a forward-looking school board, and the leadership of a remarkable community superintendent, Dr. Arthur Greenberg.
volunteers and the creation of a network of highly qualified artist mentors/partners who work with elementary teachers and students on short- and long-term projects in visual arts, music, dance, and drama; · ongoing professional development for arts specialists and classroom teachers, including CSD #25's Direct Service to Children/Professional Development for Teachers model as well as teachers' individualized plans; · a team approach to all curriculum initiatives, including the Expressive Arts Program, to ensure that arts activities are integrated across curriculum areas authentically; · the consistent work on the part of the directors of funded programs and expressive arts to work collaboratively to seek competitive funding for the district to provide innovative arts programs (see sidebar "Finding Funding").
THE SUPERINTENDENT: TAKING THE COMMUNITY'S CUE n education leader who believes that the arts are direct links to the physical, intellectual, and social development of children, Dr. Arthur Greenberg interviewed for the position of superintendent in 1990.
He indicated to the Board of Education that the first thing he would do was to visit all the schools and ask community members what they wanted to make their children's education stronger.
Board members laughed about hiring him on the spot, giving him six months to hit the road and report his findings.
After his time in the field and talks with parents (many of whom repeated the same refrain: "This is New York City, cultural Mecca of the world.
Where are the arts?"), Greenberg returned to the school board and identified those areas of the curriculum that needed bolstering.
High on his list were the "expressive arts": visual art, dance, drama, and music.
The superintendent's resulting "Areas of Emphasis" became the vision for the development of all CSD #25 curriculum initiatives, including the expressive arts.
That vision has become reality through a number of initiatives which, taken together, make for a strong infrastructure to support and to advance teaching and learning in and through the arts.
The initiatives include: · the systematic restoration of the district's elementary school music program (lost in budget cuts in the early 1990s), including a sequential program that supports early childhood teachers' use of music in the classroom, recorder instruction for all third graders, and the opportunity for fourth through sixth graders to learn to play string or band instruments; · the inclusion of community-based
CSD #25 (QUEENS, NY) Factors The Community The School Board The Superintendent District Arts Coordinator(s)
A
Statistics Schools (Total): 31 Students (Total): 23,946 Per Pupil: $4,000 Arts Teachers (Total): 91
THE LOCAL CONTEXT
C
ommunity School District #25 (CSD #25) in Queens, New York, serves some 24,000 children in grades pre-kindergarten through grade 12 from a multicultural community.
Its students come from all over the world, representing more than 100 countries and speaking 95 languages.
District #25 is a highly challenged school district.
At the same time, it is hugely blessed with the artistic wealth of New York City.
It benefits not merely from opportunities for students' "exposure" to the arts, but from the direct involvement of world-class artists in the district's classrooms.
Dancers, musicians, actors, visual artists from City Center, Young Audiences, Studioin-a-School, Carnegie Hall, the Alvin Ailey Dance Theater Foundation, the Isamu Noguchi Garden Museum, the Asia Society, the Paul Taylor Dance Company, the Museum of Modern Art, the Marquis Studios, TheatreMoves, Columbia University, the Brooklyn Conservatory of Music and more play active roles in teaching and learning in this school district.
With such a wealth of resources available to the community, it may come as a surprise for some to learn that until 1991, like most of New York City, the district's elementary schools had no music program and many of its model arts partnership programs were
A COORDINATOR'S PIVOTAL ROLE
O
ne of the first moves Greenberg made toward implementing the community's "bring back the arts" consensus was hiring Dr. Sharon Dunn, the district's first arts coordinator in a decade and a half and now special assistant to the chancellor for the entire New York City school system.
Under Dunn's leadership and later under her successor team of Arlene Jordan and Pat Lieberman, the district concentrated not only on hiring specialists but also on bringing the value of arts education back to the schools.
To do this, they encouraged "integration" of the arts into the curriculum.
They also elected to make a modest start: Dunn created a small pool of money and concentrated on the schools most interested in having arts education (approximately onethird of the district's schools).
As interest among District #25 educators has increased, with more classroom teachers voting to add arts specialists to their schools' "teacher cluster," the district arts program and its pool of funds and grants have grown as well.
Superintendent Greenberg's philosophy likens the approach to Tom Sawyer and his fence: Limit initial parcontinued on next page
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
17
CSD #25: FINDING FUNDING It would be understandable if a student of arts education were to point to the renaissance of the arts in New York City as the cause of CSD #25's recent successes.
Indeed, funds received by CSD #25 through the Center for Arts Education (Annenberg III) and Project ARTS initiatives to restore and expand arts education in all schools have been very welcome and well used, constructing, for example, studios at the performing arts junior high school.
However, like communities all across the country, CSD #25 has been supporting the arts through local funding for the past six or seven years.
The district has sought and received competitive funding to supplement its operating budget from such organizations and programs as the National Endowment for the Arts, Federal Title VII Grants, New York State Council on the Arts, New York Foundation for the Arts, New York State Education Department Improving School Services, and Comprehensive Educational Plan Grants.
The community of Flushing, New York, has exhibited major support for the arts, making its facilities available for special district arts events throughout the year.
In addition, the arts budget has been augmented by arts partners who chose to provide services to CSD #25 through grants that they had won, recognizing that the district had made an extraordinary commitment to arts education.
The annual budget for the district is now more than $95 million.
The allocation for arts education in the 1997-98 school year was approximately $4.7 million, or 5 percent.
In fact, the researchers for this study who spent several days in the district did find variations in the quality and rigor of arts education.
But the district is addressing these inconsistencies through professional development of teachers and also by strengthening the arts specialist programs.
Additionally, the district has provided direct assistance to principals who have requested help to "bring back" the arts.
District #25's aim is to strengthen the value of the arts throughout the district and give all administrators and educators the means to provide highquality arts education to all their students.
ARTISTS AND TEACHERS TEAM UP ecause New York is rich in cultural partners, Community School District #25 has been able to develop an intensive professional development program in which artists team with
B
teachers in short- and/or long-term relationships (sometimes multi-year).
Artists work with teachers to develop lessons appropriate to the students' curricula, based on the New York State standards, then coach the teacher in techniques of their particular discipline.
They team-teach classes, giving each other feedback.
Over time, the teachers learn to incorporate certain artistic skills.
The artists learn more about classroom management and curricula, and, in some cases, start taking education courses to gain teacher certification.
CSD #25 is also tapping the talents of New York's institutions of higher learning such as St. John's University and Columbia University.
Three elementary schools, for example, are partnering with Columbia arts educators, researchers, and program developers to find ways to incorporate media arts into the traditional arts education curriculum.
Lessons for New York City's Superintendents "The Arts for Literacy" was the theme of the Fordham University-New York City Superintendent Network's Forum held on one of the days the study's research team visited.
Dr. Arthur Greenberg, then superintendent of Community School District #25, is the current chair of the group.
Greenberg has a reputation throughout the boroughs for his support of arts education, as does his former arts supervisor, Dr. Sharon Dunn.
(Both have since been recruited by Chancellor Rudy Crew for the central administration.
Greenberg, whose CSD #25 successor is Michelle Fratti, is now serving as Supervising Superintendent for Executive and New Program Development.)
"You have got to believe in the arts yourself first," Greenberg told his colleagues.
"You can't expect your staff to make reform, to bring back the arts, if you won't take the lead."
Greenberg recounted his early work in District #25, espousing what he calls his Theory of Sloppy Change: Begin with schools and personnel committed to the arts and strengthen their programs first.
Columbia University's Dr. Maxine Greene also challenged the superintendents, urging them to clarify their philosophy of arts education, consider its specific application in each of their unique districts, and determine what skills he or she needs to implement it.
Through small group discussions, the superintendents tackled the questions of personal philosophy and planning.
They agreed that each needed to: · develop a personal definition of "arts" for their district; · decide their view on "art for art's sake" and state their commitment; · determine the utility of the arts for work, citizenship, other public values; · set out a belief system: why the arts count; · show the connections: to community, among disciplines.
And they agreed on key elements of a formal plan: · state a vision and mission, write goals and objectives; · actively communicate with school and community; · lay out a realistic timeline; · commit resources to implementation, including: ½ staffing and materials, ½ professional development for arts specialists and others so the arts are integrated, ½ assessment and evaluation procedures to gauge effectiveness.
ticipation to only those most interested, let others watch the fun, and they'll line up for the chance to paint the fence (bring the arts into their classrooms).
In practice, it hasn't been quite so easy for Community School District #25 to rebuild the arts in its schools.
For one thing, the district has site-based leadership: Principals have choices, such as whether, how, and how much arts education to offer.
For another, integration of the arts into curricula for other disciplines presents a challenge to educators seeking to maintain a high quality of arts education district-wide.
PAGE
18
A Case Study:
GREENVILLE COUNTY (SC) Factors Statistics The Community Schools (Total): 92 The School Board Students (Total): 58,000 The Superintendent Per Pupil: $6,578 Continuity in Leadership Arts Teachers (Total): 206 District Arts Coordinator(s) A Cadre of Principals Teachers Who Practice Their Art Parent/Public Relations An Elementary Foundation Opportunities for Higher Levels of Achievement National, State, Other Outside Forces Planning
½
THE LOCAL CONTEXT
T
he School District of Greenville County is the largest in South Carolina and one of the largest in the Southeast, serving 58,000 students, 28 percent of them African-American and 72 percent white.
One-fifth of the children receive free or reduced lunch.
Within its 800 square miles, it encompasses 92 urban, suburban, and rural schools, including cluster arts magnet programs and elementary and middle school arts academies.
Its arts program at the elementary level employs 48 teams of full-time certified teachers in art, music, and physical education (dance).
The district has four afterschool orchestras, the only daily strings chamber music program at the high school level in the United States, and an after-school program for gifted and talented elementary and middle school students which engages nearly 500 students for 100 minutes twice a week in the visual arts, drama, dance, and strings instruction.
In addition, there is a two-week summer program that serves 250 elementary students and 150 middle school students on a firstcome, first-admitted basis.
½
½
½
GREENVILLE: EVERYTHING GOING FOR ARTS EDUCATION
½
T
o the arts educator or school system administrator regarding it from afar, the School District of Greenville might appear to have everything going for it.
Indeed, nearly every factor that this study has found to contribute to the building and sustaining of strong system-wide arts education can be found at work in Greenville: ½ a community that supports the arts...including parents who always pitch in with materials, muscle, or matching funds for grants or special
½
projects; artists who participate in residencies and conduct professional development workshops for teachers on every imaginable art form; arts organizations that work with students in the schools and in their own theaters and rehearsal halls, and businesses such as General Electric, which provides foundation grants for needy children to attend performances; Fluor Daniel, which makes possible programs at the Fine Arts Center (see sidebar), and the American Federal Bank, which underwrites the Arts Teacher of the Year Award; a school board, twice recognized for excellence by the Kennedy Center and National School Boards Association, which voted approval of two new select schools for the arts at the elementary and middle school level, and, within the past two years, has created 58 new positions in the arts to meet the district's needs; a former superintendent, Dr. Thomas E. Kerns, who envisioned a balanced curriculum that included the arts in Greenville ­ a vision that continues to be supported today by the district's current superintendent, Dr. Rudolph Gordon; continuity of support for arts education that goes back to the 1960s when the district employed music and art consultants to ensure quality programs in every school and continuity of arts education delivery by excellent art teachers who kept the delivery of arts education consistent throughout periods of district-level leadership change; a cadre of principals who have stayed in the district for decades and encouraged school environments ­ schools alive with murals of rolling South Carolina hills, dense forests, rollicking sea waves ­ in which the arts and children thrive; district arts coordinators who have succeeded in making the teachers and students, curricula and class schedules, instruments and art materials, community and administration, band rooms and budgets for an extraordinarily rich set of arts education offerings come together into a cohesive district-wide program; teachers who practice their art, including some, like former classroom teacher Deborah Rose, who so loved practicing her art outside the school that she moved to teaching art full-time (see sidebar);
½ attention to parent/public relations, reinforcing the bond between community and school district in the most effective ways possible ­ by sharing student art in all its myriad forms with the community through festivals, art shows, poetry readings at a local cafe, performances of the jazz guitar ensemble, the string quartets, the gospel choir, the dance company, the theater productions, the superintendent's holiday greeting cards, and by communicating with parents and public the students', teachers' and districts' successes; ½ an elementary foundation, with mandatory instruction for every student (K-5) in art, music, and physical education (dance), followed by a sixth-grade requirement for each student to elect either visual arts or music (strings, band, or choral); in some schools, it is possible to take drama and, at the elementary arts academy, to take daily dance classes; ½ opportunities for higher levels of achievement in the arts, including the twice-weekly, after-school gifted and talented program A.R.M.E.S.
(Arts Reaching Middle and Elementary Schools) attended by more than 500 elementary and middle school students in visual art, strings, dance, and drama; Advanced Placement courses in drawing and studio art, music theory and art history; two arts academies ­ Stone (elementary) and League (middle) ­ and the Fine Arts Center (secondary); ½ national, state forces, including the National Standards for Arts Education, the South Carolina Visual and Performing Arts Framework, and, overall, a state structure that has been unusually supportive of arts education (see "ABC Project" sidebar); ½ planning, including five-year plans created by the school board since 1970 ­ long before "strategic planning" became de rigueur for school districts.
FINANCIAL REALITIES nd yet, even in Greenville, the arts have not been ­ are not now ­ immune from the financial woes or changes in leadership that affect the health of arts education elsewhere in the nation.
Financial realities first hit home in Greenville in the late 1980s and early 1990s.
In 1989, the School continued on next page
A
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
19
District of Greenville County had just received another major tribute, the state's highest arts education honor, the Elizabeth O'Neill Verner Award.
But in 1991, due to a serious revenue shortfall, the music and arts consultant positions were eliminated; the following year the district lost the fifthgrade strings program.
Then, in 1995, the school board and then-superintendent Patrick Timothy Jenny reinstated these positions, and, with two new consultants, the commitment to high-level arts education was reemphasized.
Under the leadership of Dr. Rudolph Gordon, the 1997-98 school year and the current year has seen the employment of
seven new related arts teams (comprised of art, music, and physical education teachers) to assist the 41 elementary-level teams in place in order to provide 30 minutes of arts education to the all-day, five-year-old kindergartens.
More teams will be added for the 60-plus kindergartens coming online.
The elementary arts teams, along with art, music, drama, and dance teachers at the middle and high school levels, elect "lead teachers" who represent them in policy and curriculum discussions.
The leads and the afterschool choral, orchestra, band, and drama teachers recently were awarded salary supplements to recompense them for the extra hours they spend each day providing extra training to students.
A World History Tour Via Integrated Curricula In less than 50 minutes of classtime, Riverside High School art teacher Pat Grills and his students gave this study's research team a lesson in world religion and history through the lens of architecture and art history.
After brief introductions in the classroom, the class traipsed outside, visitors in tow, to the Western and Eastern Empires.
There, laid out to scale on the school's playing fields, were the students' architectural re-creations of the ancient world's great buildings.
Proudly presenting their replicas in historical context, the students traveled from site to site, telling their visitors how the followers of Judaism, Islam, and Christianity had constructed buildings for their separate religions which, over centuries, became focal points for conflict and resolution.
ONE FINE ARTS CENTER Greenville's pride and joy is its Fine Arts Center (FAC), the school district's hub for intense study in the arts.
It was launched 27 years ago by South Carolina arts legend Virginia Ulrich ­ community member, activist, teacher, principal, and, today, the powerhouse behind the future Governor's School for the Arts, which will bring top arts students to Greenville from all over the state.
The Fine Arts Center's focus is and will continue to be the School District of Greenville County, providing opportunities in the fine and performing arts to those students in the district most interested and qualified.
Here more than 260 diverse students can expand their horizons beyond music, art, drama to dance, photography, and creative writing.
Fine Arts Center students spend half the day at their home-base schools, the other half at the center pursuing pre-professional studies, often with a particular concentration, under the guidance of highly accomplished artist-teachers.
According to student David Blackwood, one highlight is the Center's teaching faculty who "allow you to shape your projects and facilitate rather than dictate or demonstrate."
The researchers for this study first met Blackwood when they visited the center and found him working independently on his two-dimensional portfolio.
Later they discovered that he also had a stunning ability to work in three dimensions crafting metal ­ and that his talents had been highlighted in glass on metal: The Enamelist's Magazine.
There was one more thing: Like so many arts students, the researchers learned, he performed well in other areas ­ and had just scored "perfect 800s" on the SATs.
FILLING
IN
GREENVILLE'S GAPS
S
till, even in Greenville, most teachers continue to see needs and fill them, often without thought of recompense.
And even in Greenville, it is essential to find and deploy resources where they are lacking.
Parents help, either as volunteers or through their direct donations or in the more formal manner of Parent Teacher Associations.
Business Education Partnerships provide dollars, equipment, and supplies.
The Alliance for Quality Education ­ a local granting agency whose interest is supplementing the budgets of public schools with funds for innovative teachers and programs ­ distributes more than $50,000 each year to schools and to teachers, some of which is for arts programs.
Southern Bell teacher grants aid arts teachers, along with those in other disciplines; the Metropolitan Arts Council makes awards to teachers and to schools, and the South Carolina Arts Commission, through its Artist Education Initiative, has an enormous impact on the face of public education.
Service clubs, particularly Rotary Clubs, underwrite three community projects that, over their long histories, have become community fixtures: "The Singing Christmas Tree," "Spring Sing", and "A Night of Music."
It is through their efforts that some students get their first experience performing for an audience in the highly regarded arts complex in downtown Greenville, the Peace Center for the Performing Arts.
The district emphasizes the need for schools to develop business part-
ners who can help the school by providing volunteers for specific programs, technology in the form of donated used copiers and computers, even direct donations.
One of the most successful direct grant partnerships is the one between the Fine Arts Center and the world's largest construction company, Fluor Daniel.
For several years, the company has underwritten a major portion of the match monies required for one of the largest individual school artist-in-residence grants in South Carolina.
CHANGES IN EDUCATIONAL FOCUS ven in Greenville, there can be periods of transition.
The district has experienced several in recent years: transitions from superintendents Kerns to Jenny to Gordon.
In addition, the school board has acquired more conservative members and its focus has shifted towards "back to basics."
So school board members such as Margaret Griffin Burch and Ann Sutherlin who together have spent more than two decades on the school board, can find themselves once again "making the case" for the arts in education at the district level.
Parents and arts educators also find themselves making the case at the school level today.
Since the district moved to site-based decision making and the state passed "accountability"
E
PAGE
20
legislation, principals are evaluated on the test scores of their students.
But the arts ­ seen as difficult to "measure" ­ are not tested.
Some Greenville principals privately expressed concern to this study's researchers that, despite their support of the arts, the fact is that student performance in the arts does not put their jobs at risk but it does in math.
Other principals said that the arts help them in so many areas ­ early learning, student engagement, parental
involvement ­ that keeping the arts strong is worth the investment and will pay off in the long run.
Superintendent Gordon felt enlightened principals with a vision for total education would find ways to include the arts.
Long-time arts teachers deduce that since the arts are not part of the principal accountability system, they run a real risk of alienation for the first time in decades.
AT THE HEART OF THE IN GREENVILLE: TEAMS OF
ARTS
ARTS TEACHERS
POLITICAL REALITIES ven in Greenville, administrators must take political realities into account.
Sometimes it is a matter of focus or emphasis.
When principal Edward Holliday, for example, set about transforming a neighborhood elementary school into an arts-focused school, he encountered some community resistance.
Working with the district leadership, he was able to build the school around a broader, more inclusive definition of the arts as they relate to communications.
The resulting Stone Academy of Communication Arts has since earned kudos from "conservative" and "liberal" community members alike.
In 1997 the South Carolina Arts Commission designated it as an official Arts in the Basic Curriculum site.
Similarly, Dr. Roy Fluhrer, who directs the successful 27-year-old artsmagnet high school, the Fine Arts Center, finds himself revisiting the mission of the school and looking at new ways to make it a resource for the district's other schools.
Whether grounded in reality or perception, a recurring issue associated with special schools is the drain of talent.
The challenge before Fluhrer is to unify the vision of a high school for students specializing in the arts to that of a specialized facility that serves the arts education needs of other schools as well.
Even in Greenville, the future of the arts in education is a little fragile in the face of competition for more funding for "academics."
The challenge arts education leaders in Greenville see as the district enters the 21st century will be to maintain funding for the arts at levels commensurate with its importance to student development.
Fluhrer summed up, "You can do it, but you still have to work to make it flourish."
E
The Arts in Basic Curriculum (ABC) Project A statewide collaborative initiative begun in 1987, the Arts in Basic Curriculum (ABC) Project aims to ensure that every child in South Carolina, from pre-school through college levels, has access to a quality, comprehensive education in the arts, including dance, drama, music, visual arts and creative writing.
Cooperatively directing the ABC Project are the South Carolina Arts Commission, the South Carolina Department of Education, and the College of Visual and Performing Arts at Winthrop University.
The project's statewide steering committee of more than 80 leaders of schools and school districts, colleges and universities, artists, educators, arts organizations, government, and business meets three times each year to recommend and review initiatives.
The project sponsors a model sites program that provides grant funds for the development of innovative arts programs.
Its "blueprint" for arts education, completed in 1988 with funds from the National Endowment for the Arts (NEA), provides a forum for the development of strategic arts initiatives and serves as the foundation for a broad advocacy coalition for arts education reform in South Carolina.
The ABC blueprint also outlines a curriculum to be taught by qualified arts teachers and reinforced by other subject area teachers, administrators, professional artists, arts organizations, and community resources.
The ABC Project Office serves as clearinghouse for Arts Education in South Carolina: The ABC Project, 105 McLaurin Hall, Winthrop University, Rock Hill, SC 29733; (800) 277-0036.
The ABC Project Web site, from which the above description is drawn, is 
rts educators in Greenville function as teams, so the researchers for this study often met with teachers in pairs and found them quite knowledgeable about one another's work.
Veteran visual art teacher Deborah Rose and her colleague, music specialist Andrea Stephens, embody this collaborative spirit.
When the researchers first visited Taylors Elementary School and met Rose, her hands full of clay, she talked with great enthusiasm about her career as a classroom teacher who had discovered she loved art so much that she moved to teaching it full time.
Stephens spoke with equal passion about the newness, excitement, and challenges of her first year of teaching music.
These colleagues share a bond that goes beyond discipline.
Rose has given the benefit of her teaching experience to Stephens, who talked about classroom management and teaching ideas she learned from the senior teacher.
Both credited Taylors Elementary principal Mary Woods, who has been at the school almost two decades, for their productive environment.
Woods is a highly focused, effective educator.
Awards dot her office wall.
She is clearly an institution in both the school and the community at large.
In part because of her support, both music and art enjoy large, well-equipped spaces in which the students seemed at home, whether learning to pinch pots or dance to Japanese music.
Whether Greenville principals will continue to give such strong support to arts specialists remains to be seen given South Carolina's new accountability act which measures principals' performance by test scores in other areas of the curriculum.
A
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
21
A Case Study:
LAS CRUCES (NM) Factors Statistics Schools (Total): 32 The Community Students (Total): 22,454 The School Board Per Pupil: $3,624 The Superintendent Continuity in Leadership Arts Teachers (Total): 65 A Cadre of Principals Parent/Public Relations Opportunities for Higher Levels of Achievement
THE LOCAL CONTEXT
T
he second largest city in the State of New Mexico, Las Cruces lies northwest of El Paso, Texas.
In this place many cultures that have shaped this part of the country meet, perhaps most exuberantly in the schools of Dona Ana County.
Outside, above the doorway of the Las Cruces Public Schools administration building, which is housed in a renovated department store, a tiled mosaic of the district logo, designed by a young student, announces to visitors that the arts are at home here.
Inside, the gateway to the district offices shines with the latest secondary students' art exhibit.
The permanent student art collection can be found just around the corner.
The vitality and vibrancy of the building make it hard to imagine this as a school district in which the arts had no place 15 years ago.
In the words of school board member Mary Tucker, "We had nothing."
The lesson of Las Cruces is one of a community taking stock and rebuilding with the arts at the heart of learning, from kindergarten up.
put a high priority on rebuilding the arts program here."
Once that decision was made in 1983, the district began conducting an in-depth assessment of Las Cruces' curriculum and enrollment, goals and objectives, and the school board took to a hard look at the elementary and secondary music program.
That assessment and ongoing community support eventually led to passage of a $1 million bond issue to upgrade, refurbish, and supply new instruments to the music program.
In this period, the board also brought Jesse Gonzales on board as superintendent to continue to increase district support to the arts, step by step: · A Point Person for the Arts The next critical step was Gonzales's hiring of John Schutz, a 25-year veteran band leader, as district coordinator for visual and performing arts.
First a part-time coordinator, then full-time, Schutz became the district's "point person" for the arts.
"He's the voice that reminds us about the arts and lets us know how we're doing in the rebuilding process," says a board member.
Schutz, in turn, reached out to arts educators to help them plan for growth.
He made visual arts a priority since music was his specialty ­ a move that the district's visual arts educators noted and appreciated.
He built value into the visual arts by requiring principals to bid for the expanding programs by indicating how much space, matched time and money their schools would supply.
Meanwhile, state education reform measures mandated that the only local expenditures allowed in the district were to be for capital or material needs.
So the community's passage of the $1 million bond to help refurbish music equipment represented a major demonstration of community support and a large commitment of resources.
· The School's Portfolio: A Principal's Measure of Support Since then, the commitment of key school leaders has also become stronger.
Las Cruces principals, in particular, have been important to the rebuilding of arts education.
While visiting Las Cruces, the study's researchers/reporters had the opportunity to sit in on the secondary principals' regular Thursday morning meeting led by Superintendent Gonzales.
After moving through issues as varied as uniforms, school choice, and busing ­ extremely important in this growing rural area of New Mexico ­ Gonzales encouraged the principals to form ad hoc groups to achieve consensus on the issues.
He concluded the meeting by reminding them that he was coming around to meet with each one to review and discuss his or her portfolio.
"Take me through it ­ what you've achieved for the kids, what's important," the superintendent said.
Each principal keeps a portfolio of accomplishments for the school, for the students.
In turn, each elementary arts educator keeps a portfolio to share with his/her principal and other school leaders.
· The Teacher's Portfolio: Evidence of Success in Arts Education It was no surprise, therefore, that each elementary visual arts educator with whom the study team met whipped out his/her teacher portfolio without prompting.
Teacher Bonnie Hosie flipped through a sampling of a year's worth of student work, explaining the curriculum she and other teachers had developed.
"Here we study the color wheel, and here they work with mixing color two ways - once in pencil, next in fingerpaint.
I can remember when one student looked up to me and held up his paint-covered hands and said, 'Orange! Red and yellow make orange!' He looked back down at them and never forgot.
Weeks later, he would still look at his hands to remember color mixing."
From skill exploration to the unit on the seasons, Hosie could show exactly what she had taught and what students had learned in her classes.
· The Students' Portfolios: Pictures of Pride in Their Work The students keep portfolios, too.
As Las Cruces rebuilds the arts in the early years, students select and maintain portfolios demonstrating their learning in the visual arts through the years.
These portfolios sit near the front of the classroom, a position of honor.
Students and teachers alike use them to show, gauge, and grow.
At Vista Middle School, students in the sixth through eighth grades develop portfolios as part of their "Right of Passage Experience."
Music and art and other subjects are included.
AN ARTS COUNCIL AGENT OF CHANGE
AS
W
hen the people of Las Cruces look to identify the key agent of change for arts education in their community, they point to the Dona Ana Arts Council.
Despite band parents' and arts students' out-of-pocket contributions to music and visual arts activities, the school district had no plans to restore the arts until the arts council organized parents in support of arts education.
The school board began to listen when a larger, stronger parents' group delivered a clearer, louder message: that the school district should take on ­ and build upon ­ the arts education responsibilities the parents had assumed.
As one board member said, "The parents' support helped us decide to
PAGE
22
BLOCK SCHEDULING IN LAS CRUCES: NO ROADBLOCK TO ARTS LEARNING "Band parents" like Doug and Jan Brown have long been the backbone of music programs nationwide.
Their son Jeremy, a high school senior at Las Cruces' Mayfield High School, and his parents talked about his commitment to music over dinner with the researchers during their visit.
Without a lot of fanfare, over the years Jeremy had quietly become the trombone mainstay of his school band, and, when it came time to plan his schedule for senior year, he told his parents he wanted to include music as one of his areas of concentration.
Doug Brown was worried that, with the new block scheduling at Mayfield, college-bound Jeremy's academic performance would suffer if he spent too much time in the arts.
"One-fourth of my son's education was going to be spent in band.
That was hard to swallow at first.
Then, as I saw what playing did for him ­ he's a quiet kid, but he really shines in band ­ I saw how he learned and grew.
I became a believer."
Jeremy's parents' willingness to accommodate his music studies was matched by Mayfield High's willingness to adapt as well.
The entire Las Cruces district is moving towards block scheduling.
Mayfield began restructuring in 1995-96 as it moved to a full block schedule with a four-period day throughout the week.
Traditional two-semester classes are offered in one semester.
Students take fewer courses.
For Mayfield, the key to this transition has been flexibility.
In order for Jeremy to continue to pursue band and Advanced Placement coursework, Mayfield guidance counselors developed an independent AP English course so he could attend band.
This adaptation impressed the Browns, who felt that Jeremy would not have to choose "arts" or "academics."
He could do both.
Las Cruces uses block scheduling in different forms, including 4x4 with a 6-period Monday and the above 5x4.
Arts educators mentioned their concerns about the changes.
Among them is a possible reduction in enrollment in arts courses given that students will take fewer courses on these schedules.
Professional development and a risk-free year of experimentation have helped the transition in Mayfield.
The students interviewed preferred block scheduling: "Less stress, less homework."
"More time to learn; you're not bouncing around so quickly."
Ruth Bird, one of the visual arts teachers at Mayfield, appreciated the extra time to work and develop ideas with students.
Eighth graders schedule an appointment to present their work before three of their peers and their teachers.
Parents and grandparents often attend.
The students then answer questions, much like an oral dissertation defense, to demonstrate their knowledge of the material covered.
"It's an emotional experience.
It helps them with the realization that middle school is over ­ and see what they have learned!" says principal Olivia Ogas.
· Presentations to the School Board: Keeping the Arts in Mind Every board meeting begins with a student performance.
The board meeting that the researchers attended was packed with presenting district administrators, parents of performing students, and other community members.
Led by an award-winning elementary music teacher, Laurie Norman, a class marched in to the library and began to sing and dance.
The teacher conducted and coaxed as Orff instruments accompanied young voices.
For the finale, large tires and bottles, wrapping paper and paper bags started rattling and shaking during a difficult counterpoint piece about recycling.
John Schutz explained that the performances help keep the arts on the table as board members ­ former educators, a business leader, a former legislator ­ make decisions that affect education.
Schutz, for example, has begun exploring ways to expand dance in the Las Cruces schools by engaging the community.
As schools dabble with groups like Ballet Folklorico, he can remind board members of the successes of the Las Cruces High School Mariachi Band, which linked arts education to community culture.
One important way the board supports the arts is to keep the arts in mind during discussions about remodeling or new construction.
"When it's time to build a new building," said a member, "that's the time to remember the arts.
I'm the one who remembers to ask, 'What about the music sound system? What about the music space?' In a rapidly growing district, the commitment of space makes all the difference in the years to come."
· Continuity in Las Cruces Las Cruces has the benefit of a stable board and a superintendent who enjoys the board's support and, therefore, remains in his eleventh year.
But Las Cruces still faces challenges of resources and expansion.
The visual arts program at the elementary level continues to grow slowly, but it may begin facing funding competition from incoming technology initiatives.
Theater appears to be less valued in the community, and the expense of meeting ADA (Americans with Disabilities Act) requirements for accessibility to stages has affected Las Cruces' decision not to invest heavily in raised proscenium performance spaces.
Lack of a large enough performing space limits the district and the community.
Despite any drawbacks or concerns, however, the atmosphere from community to school leaders, superintendent to district coordinator, parent to student, new teacher to veteran is one of arts growth and strengthening.
Las Cruces is moving forward to reform education and including the arts at the heart of their children's learning.
A Case Study:
MIAMI DADE COUNTY (FL) Factors Statistics Schools (Total): 328 The Community Students (Total): 341,000 The School Board Per Pupil: $5,137 The Superintendent Continuity in Leadership Arts Teachers (Total): 1,200 District Arts Coordinator(s) A Cadre of Principals Teachers Who Practice Their Art An Elementary Foundation Opportunities for Higher Levels of Achievement National, State, Other Outside Forces
THE LOCAL CONTEXT iami-Dade County is not only the fourth largest school system in the country ­ with more than 340,000 students and nearly 18,000 teachers ­ but it is also one of the nation's most diverse.
The district's students come from 155 different countries and speak 150 different languages, which adds language barriers to the hurdles of poverty and other urban ills constantly facing Miami schools leadership.
continued on next page
M
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
23
THE SCHOOL BOARD'S COMMITMENT
T
he arts, officially embraced by the school board in the early 1990s, have become critical components of the district's strategy to manage and benefit from its diversity.
As 35-year-board member G. Holmes Braddock told this study's visiting researchers, "As a board, we decided that we needed to make a statement about the arts ­ that they were as basic as any other subject."
That policy, still in place and supported by superintendent Roger C. Cuevas nearly a decade later, reflects the community's politically demonstrated desire to make the arts part of learning in Miami-Dade County.
It was a grassroots swell from the arts community, which elected arts advocate Betsy H. Kaplan to the board, that led in part to the board's commitment to the arts.
An avid arts supporter over decades in the classroom, community, and politics, Kaplan serves as a walking, talking, voting reminder of the commitment the board made and continues to keep by its actions.
Arts education, for example, has not been compromised to help pull up the slack elsewhere in the curriculum.
Even when some district schools and their language arts programs were deemed "deficient" by the State of Florida Board of Education, the School Board chose not to cut art, music, and physical education in favor of language arts.
Instead, the Miami-Dade County board opted to extend the school day by one hour in those schools to allow for the additional hour of language arts.
Board members also advocate the arts statewide by their participation in a multitude of arts-related conferences and organizations.
Kaplan has served for more than 10 years on the Florida Alliance for Arts Education/Arts for a Complete Education board, which makes recommendations to the Florida Department of Education.
But as many a school district has discovered, the only certainty is change.
Miami-Dade County's board of education grew from seven members to nine members in the last elections, changing from at-large to single-member district representation.
As a result, the board's dynamics have begun to change.
That fact ­ as well as a relatively recent change of superintendent ­ presents the board's current challenge: learning how to work
together to develop and strengthen consensus of policy direction as Miami-Dade County Public Schools move into a new millennium.
Meanwhile, translating the board's vision into a system-wide way of teaching and learning in and through the arts has been and continues to be the work of a large, committed network that includes the superintendent, school principals, district arts supervisors, teachers, parents, and civic groups.
In searching for clues to how a school district builds and sustains strong arts education, the researchers for this report met with and observed many participants in that vital network.
A Page at a Time While visiting Biscayne Gardens Elementary School in Miami, researchers for this study had the pleasure of meeting two sixth-grade students who showed them a compelling large-format book they and their classmates had made the year before.
The book, entitled A Page at a Time, grew out of an instructional unit with the theme "Conflict and Resolution" that had been planned cooperatively by social studies, language arts, and visual arts teachers.
Students from five elementary schools in the district visited the Wolfsonian Museum, which specializes in the decorative and propaganda arts, in Miami Beach.
There students viewed artworks related to the First and Second World War and, in the museum's library, perused book, many of them rare and beautiful, that chronicled in words and images the conflicts of this century.
Back at school, the Biscayne Gardens elementary students fashioned a cover of stitched fabric that evoked both chaos and calm.
Inside, students painted canvas pages with vivid shapes and lines that echoed the chaos and calm of the book's cover.
At the center of each page, they mounted a photographic portrait of a student.
Each portrait, however, was printed on transparent acetate, which made it possible to see fragments of student handwriting on the sheets beneath the photographs.
The sheets were filled with stories and historical accounts of how students' family members and other acquaintances had experienced conflict in their lives and how they had resolved it.
The students had conducted the interviews and written the chronicles of family struggles and triumphs.
The Wolfsonian directors and curators so appreciated this book and those made by the students in the other participating schools that they purchased them for the museum's permanent collection.
THE MANY LESSONS OF LILIA GARCIA AND THE DIVISION OF LIFE SKILLS f Betsy Kaplan has served as the community's arts beacon on the school board, the lightning rod in the operating system of arts learning is Lilia Garcia, director of the Division of Life Skills, which houses the visual and performing arts programs, along with physical education, for the entire district.
Some 20 years ago, Garcia helped to organize arts teachers into a powerful lobby that gained the support of key school board members, business leaders, local arts organizations, and parents.
"We became a force to be reckoned with," said Garcia.
Today Garcia is a force to be recognized ­ the linchpin for district-wide arts learning for all students at all levels in all schools, taught by full-time certified arts specialists.
Under her leadership, the Division of Life Skills has an explicit policy of relating to "the implementation of a series of reading, writing, and mathematics learning strategies that are integrated with the arts curriculums and which focuses on supporting the [school] District initiative of raising performance standards."
It seems to matter little in which curriculum area the district undertakes an initiative.
Lilia Garcia and her staff of arts supervisors will ask the question, How do the arts fit into this new program? Miami-Dade's "Sketchbook/ Journal" projects, which take place in a number of schools around the district, exemplify the initiatives that integrate the arts and other school subjects.
In this case, it is the visual and language
I
arts.
The Sketchbook/Journal's goal includes the enhancement of children's "ability to express themselves clearly and creatively" to provide "a way for students to travel from where they are at the beginning of the book to a better place at the end."
Visual and verbal imagery interact as students
PAGE
24
draw pictures that retell stories, which they then rewrite.
They draw pictures that show a sequence of events and then write about the sequence.
They draw pictures that show customs shared by different cultures, and they share ideas about those customs with classmates.
By transferring ideas from one symbol system to another, and sometimes to another and another, students become involved in several school subjects simultaneously, and often the arts provide the catalyst for the translation of knowledge from realm to realm.
Garcia's team of arts supervisors also puts a lively public face on the district's arts commitment.
They are out in the community ­ in the schools, at local arts events ­ presenting student artwork, arranging performances, promoting the district's arts activities with well-honed skills and polished materials.
They practice teamwork.
Within the first hour and a half of the researchers' visit, the Miami-Dade County arts supervisors scheduled parades, ordered buses, promoted their new curriculum, planned professional development activities, reorganized their visitors' schedules and transportation, then walked them to the ArtWorks Gallery at the Omni Mall to watch the jurying of student artwork for the national Scholastic Art Awards.
The Omni Mall is one of many businesses partnering with the school district in a multitude of well-attended district-wide music festivals, dance and choreography adjudication and showcases, student exhibitions, theater arts showcases, evenings of one-act plays.
These showcases are, admittedly, good public relations for the school district and the businesses, but they also provide another opportunity ­ the opportunity for the community to assess the work of students, teachers, and arts supervisors.
Three Miami-Dade County arts supervisors on hand at the Omni Mall articulated the importance of arts educators' participation in their art form as well as in education.
Ray Azcuy, district visual arts supervisor, explained that he and his colleagues William Chiodo and Marie Mennes, as well as the music and theater arts supervisors, are assessed on their performance and knowledge of their arts discipline.
Robert T. Davis, currently the only music supervisor, shared a bit about his self-selected professional development portfolio for the district: Part of his montage was to
write and compose a book of new holiday pieces and make them available to the district's music staff.
Dr. Robert D. Strickland, theater arts supervisor, is an activist and presence in the Miami theater community.
Like Strickland, Miami-Dade County's 1,200 district arts teachers actively participate in their disciplines.
While visiting the district, this report's researchers spent one evening attending a professional production of Goodby, My Friduchita, a play written by district drama educator Delores Sendler.
If Miami-Dade's teachers, students, and community benefit from so many opportunities to participate in a lively and creative environment, they also reap the rewards of opportunities that, while somewhat less public, are no less important to arts education in the district.
One such high-impact program brings together students, teachers, and the rich resources of the area's museums.
Every week, 27 elementary arts educators spend at least one day in one of 16 art museums and galleries around Miami.
These "museum educators" facilitate deep relationships with their adopted collection for their own students and for other students who visit.
While at the museums, the teachers develop museum-connected study guides and other educational materials that are used in the schools before and after museum visits.
The curriculum materials are shared with teachers and students throughout the district.
The visual arts teachers/museum educators lead tours for the 26,000 students who makes visits to these institutions each year.
When the teachers return to their schools for the rest of the week, they bring the depth of knowledge of the collection back with them.
Museum staff told this study's researchers how their own docents learn from these educators.
The educators spoke about a tremendous opportunity for professional growth.
The students talked in detailed, intellectual ways about the collections, their interest in art, and their relationships with artwork and the institutions.
Each year student artworks created following museum visits are exhibited in the Wolfsonian Museum.
(See sidebar.)
pals.
They found them in schools that offered a wide range of learning formats ­ "regular" to arts-focused ­ for a student population of every ethnicity.
Principal Frederick A. Morley of Charles R. Drew Elementary School in Miami's "Liberty City" cordoned off the drug wars and the prostitution down the street by creating a school of excellence.
Walk in and you find school uniforms and the arts living in harmony as young, mostly African-American (91 percent) children are busy exploring paints and clay, photography, dance, and drama.
In Morley's view, the arts keep kids engaged, involved, off the streets, and in "the right stuff."
Miami Beach Senior High School's principal, Dr. William Rénuart, also believes the arts engage youngsters in learning.
A man of colorful speech, Rénuart did not mince words with visitors as he shared the CD of a student playing and singing a Beatles tune.
"You know," he said, " this student, who made this CD ­ he couldn't even speak English or read it.
He used to give me no end of trouble.
Then he got involved in this music, and he starts this band, and that's it, he shapes up....You listened? You can't even tell the difference in his language; you would never know [he had had such problems]."
As Rénuart sees it, the arts keep kids in schools.
"If they don't come to school, you can't teach them.
So I'm going to have arts in my school."
His high school is a "regular" school with students who recently immigrated from Columbia, Nicaragua, Cuba, and the Bahamas.
The school has a Saturday program, which helps keep a web of support in place for the kids.
The arts are an important part of the Saturday program, which is showing initial success in reducing dropout rates of young people likely to leave school before finishing.
The school is also working to connect learning to "real life" by employing the arts: The "ARTEC" program brings film and technology together for at-risk students.
It gives back through student projects that serve the community.
EQUAL ACCESS AND HIGHER LEVELS OF OPPORTUNITY iami-Dade County Public School district is continuously working to keep the solid base of opportunity offered by "regular" schools in balance continued on next page
THE PRINCIPALS' DIFFERENCE
M
W
ith many award-winning schools on the site visit list, the report's researchers anticipated strong princi-
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
25
with the choice of a higher level of opportunity in "specialized" schools.
The arts have been key to that balancing act.
As Dr. Solomon Stinson, school board chair, affirmed, "The arts have been an integral partner in the development of every curriculum initiative and education practice produced at each school site and district-wide."
In Miami's "regular" schools, every child learns art and music, receiving 60 minutes of art and 90 minutes of music every week.
Many children also learn theater and dance.
The report's researchers encountered enthusiastic educators who set the tone for learning inside their rooms ­ drama teachers encouraging reading aloud (and writing in silence), art teachers bridging elementary lessons with museum collections.
They also met a few who were not engaging their students.
But by and large, the research team found a solid base of opportunity for the students, even in middle school, where the "wheel" structure ­ six to nine weeks of lessons in a particular area ­ poses challenges.
The "specialized" schools ­ the schools of choice ­ offer a higher level of opportunity.
These hubs provide the best of arts training to the students who can compete and be admitted on talent, as demonstrated in audition and portfolio.
PAVAC, the Performing and Visual Arts Center, is a school of choice within Miami Northwestern Senior High, a school that serves a primarily African-American urban community where barbed wire and cement barriers are part of the neighborhood landscape.
But open the doors of PAVAC, and visitors find students focused on music.
In one rehearsal space, a teacher admonished students ­ all trying to get into the swing of jazz ­ for not tuning up first: "If this were the gig, and you weren't tuned, you would lose the gig."
The Design and Architecture Senior High School can be found in Miami's fashion and design district.
Here one can sense the creativity and pick up students' sense of humor, too: "The Phantoms"­ the school's nonexistent sports team rendered in a large mural ­ guard the door.
Outfits of feathers, leather, lace, and cloth adorn the windows.
Design and Architecture students cut and paste, engineer and design their way to portfolios and skills that make them ready to com-
pete in the applied arts worlds waiting for them in Miami, New York, Los Angeles.
This study's researchers met one parent who pulled her child out of a private school to attend this public school of choice.
The New World School of the Arts is another unusual institution, offering both high school and state university collegiate programs with the highest level of pre-professional training, constant exposure to outside artists, and great expectations for achievement.
Students here ­ including 40 high school students who met with report researchers ­ speak of purpose and discipline, of the teachers who care, and a place to be themselves and pursue their goals.
They speak of hard work and of summer plans which will help them continue to learn more ­ from performing opportunities to working on a portfolio.
And, they say, the school cares for them: When one student had no money for dance shoes, teachers and the school found a way.
Regrets? "That the day is not longer!" one student exclaimed.
"That we do not have dorms here, since I travel an hour and a half to get here each day."
Schools of choice raise issues of equity.
The Miami-Dade magnet program, which is intertwined with the Life Skills program, certainly is the place where arts shine the brightest.
But what the researchers found in Miami as well as in Milwaukee and other districts with strong magnet programs is that the arts help create an environment for learning no matter the focus of the magnet school.
In other words, a science and technology magnet school that incorporates the arts will have a more vital environment for learning.
While Miami's 16 special arts schools/programs reach only 4,900 students ­ a small percentage of the 340,000 student population ­ they reach them well.
The question for the district leader is how to expand upon the resources of the choice schools.
How does a school district continue to raise the level of all the other schools, so they, too, experience excellence in the arts and in learning? Miami does not have easy answers.
Instead, it works hard to ensure that the baseline -- the least a child will get -- is a strong arts education.
Many a school district in America would be proud to do just that.
A Case Study:
MILWAUKEE (WI) Factors The Community The Superintendent Continuity in Leadership A Cadre of Principals National, State, Other Outside Forces
Statistics Schools (Total): 154 Students (Total): 107,043 Per Pupil: $7,768 Arts Teachers (Total): 473
THE LOCAL CONTEXT or more than 150 years, Milwaukee Public Schools have demonstrated a strong commitment to the arts in education.
Indeed, innovative arts education is a trademark of MPS education.
Not only does each school have budget line items for the arts programs, but the community, parents, the school board, and partnerships round out the resources that MPS creatively utilizes to provide model arts programming throughout Milwaukee's schools.
Largely as an outcome of Milwaukee's efforts to achieve ethnic balance of students across the district, the MPS system today is shaped by the diversity of its schools.
By designing magnet and special focus schools, the district has tried to entice students to travel from their neighborhoods to other parts of the city to enroll in special programs.
F
ONE SCHOOL'S MISSION STATEMENT Tippecanoe, a K-5 arts and humanities school, for example, provides the district's students and parents with this description of its special character: "Our nationally recognized program presents pupils with experiences in music, art, literature, philosophy, and language from multicultural and historical perspectives.
The arts and humanities are closely tied with the sciences to produce citizens who are able to function in a highly technological society.
School-to-Work activities give pupils opportunities to connect the arts, humanities, and sciences with every day experiences which will allow them to make a variety of postsecondary choices."
PAGE
26
CONTINUITY AND CHOICE: STRIKING A BALANCE FOR ARTS EDUCATION
T
he Milwaukee Public Schools district has had considerable success with its efforts.
Today, 26 of MPS's 114 elementary schools are "citywide":
Students from anywhere in the district may attend them.
Eleven schools with middle school-aged students are "citywide," and 12 are "regular."
Of the 21 schools with high school students, nine are "regular," and 12 are "citywide."
Whether "regular" or "citywide," each school must provide the commu-
nity with its philosophy of education, mission statement (see sidebar), organization, and instructional approach.
For the arts, Milwaukee students may self-select their school, choosing among an arts elementary school, two arts middle schools, one arts high school, as well as an enormous array of
Matters of Choice in Milwaukee: Three Schools of Art How is Milwaukee's vast array of educational choices and specialized programs reconciled with the general expectation that all students should receive a balanced education in (1) the sciences and mathematics; (2) the language arts; (3) visual arts and performing arts; (4) the humanities and social studies; (5) vocational options; and (6) physical education? By making every school special and by giving the arts an important place in many of its schools, Milwaukee provides a model for other districts where there is a wish to offer students a choice of quality educational programs.
It is important to point out that the great diversity of school organizational plans and programs are not imposed from the top down but just the reverse.
However, because the district has such a history of central office leadership in the arts, the innovative schools include the arts as a matter of course.
This practice has served to institutionalize the arts despite numerous changes, including changes in district leadership.
Three schools of art provide three different models of choice: Elm Creative Arts Elementary School Twenty-one years ago, before Elm Elementary School became Milwaukee's Creative Arts Elementary School, its students' achievement test scores placed the children in the district's lowest 10 percent.
After one year as an arts magnet school, although 50 percent of the neighborhood's students remained in the school, the students' achievement test scores placed them in the district's upper 10 percent.
Surely there were many factors that contributed to the first year's dramatic rise in test scores: an influx of new students whose parents wished them to receive a special type of education, enthusiastic teachers and administrators specially selected to work in the school, a curriculum that integrated the arts with each school subject, and active cooperative learning.
Parents, teachers, school administrators, arts supervisors, and students explain student achievement at Elm by pointing to these factors: · The arts make schools engaging places for children.
· Teaching and learning are fun.
· Reading, calculating, and other "academics" are not so onerous when they are done in the context of the arts (for example, students learn to compute through dance).
· The arts schools are kinetically engaging.
· They are places where learning is valued.
They also are places where the arts can flourish simply because they have facilities for dance, theater, and other art forms.
In addition, teachers and administrators in the arts-focused schools emphasize the importance of a dedicated staff and a high level of parent participation in planning school missions and programs.
Achievement test scores are very high in Milwaukee's four arts-focused schools.
These scores and other data and information, however, have not been used to determine what it is about the arts that facilitates students' learning and changes their attitudes toward school.
In many cases the data already exist; they await analysis in Milwaukee and in other cities where students have the option to attend arts schools.
A.E. Burdick's Traditional Educational Program A. E. Burdick is a neighborhood K-8 school that, according to its description, offers a "traditional educational program."
Descriptions notwithstanding, education at Burdick is far from traditional.
The school places special emphasis on music, computer technology, and multimedia education.
The music program creates an atmosphere of innovation and excitement that pervades the school.
The two full-time music teachers and parttime instrumental teachers have created a music program in which every student plays a musical instrument.
In the words of one teacher, "Every kid expects to play an instrument."
Actually, every student plays several instruments, sings, and more.
They are all composers and conductors.
The students and teachers have created an orchestra's worth of "instruments"­ an amazing collection of plastic bottles and buckets, tubes, pans, pieces of wood, metal percussion objects that hang from a wire extending the width of the music room, all sorts of things that create sounds when blown into, stroked, or beaten upon.
As a succession of student composers mounted the "podium" to conduct their compositions, other students informed the researchers, "Sure, we could recognize each kid's style, even if we couldn't see who was conducting."
Students are also able to improvise seemingly endless compositions without the aid of a conductor.
Not all the instruments created in the school are "low-tech."
When funds were unavailable to purchase a drum synthesizer, one of the music teachers and his students constructed one.
The music teachers wrote proposals and received grants for computers on which students both compose and perform their compositions.
The school has also received grants to underwrite the acquisition of digital photographic equipment so that students can create a multimedia yearbook that incorporates sound and includes students' own compositions and performances, photographic images, video clips, images and information from the Internet, produced and issued to students in either CD-ROM or video formats.
Creating a multimedia yearbook is an enormously complex task that requires students to acquire skills and competencies relating to a variety of computer programs.
The task also requires them to make thousands of design decisions relating to the relationships among graphic designs and sounds, video clips, still images, and musical compositions.
By the time the yearbook students complete eighth grade they know just about everything necessary to live productively within the digital age.
Throughout the year students work with musicians in residence ­ composers and performers.
The music program fills the entire school.
In the words of one of the music teachers, "We wanted to incorporate music into all areas of the curriculum.
We are a school family."
Because of music, Burdick is a happy family and a joyous place.
Milwaukee School of Languages Milwaukee School of Languages for students in grades 6 through 8 "offers continuing language immersion in French, German and Spanish (with a beginning elective in Japanese) for students from elementary programs or with sufficient language proficiency.
Math, language arts, and social studies are taught in the second language in grades 6-8."
In actuality, the arts ­ literature, music, visual arts, and theater ­ provide the content for large segments of the School of Language curriculum.
The reason is simple: The study of a language comes to life though the culture of its country of origin.
And what reveals culture? The arts.
The school's language teachers in each subject matter area are able to rely upon a vast collection of visual and music resources developed to support the music and art curricula.
(The district spends literally millions of dollars on arts resource materials on a regular cycle ­ the last being purchased in 1993.
These reproductions, recordings, books, and other resource materials are placed in each school ­ just like textbooks.)
More importantly, the language school's visual arts teachers serve as resources for their colleagues, suggesting the artworks that provided the specific subject matter for each language teacher's individual curriculum.
continued on next page Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
27
ASSESSMENT
AND THE
ARTS
Milwaukee is experimenting with a district-wide assessment program involving authentic/performance-based tasks.
In the arts portion of the assessment initiative, the National Standards for Arts Education have provided some evidence.
Nevertheless, Milwaukee arts teachers are working in new territory.
With the assistance of assessment consultants, district teachers developed three comprehensive arts assessment tasks ­ one for fifth grade, one for middle school, and one for high school students.
The three tasks were designed to assess students' strengths and weaknesses relating to the development, communication, or expression of an idea through the use of artistic skills and imagination.
Fifth-grade students are asked to use a variety of art forms to create a television commercial and incorporate the design of a logo.
The task assesses students' ability to use the arts to sell a product.
Middle school students are asked to produce a work, in an art form of their choice, that conveys the idea "This Is My School."
The task for high school students is creating a self-portrait that expresses "Who I Am."
They are permitted to develop their selfportraits through one or more of the arts ­ visual arts, dance/movement, theater/acting, creative writing, or music.
Through comprehensive assessment exercises, students are to demonstrate: (1) their preference for a particular art form or combination of art forms, (2) the degree to which they have mastered the skills, techniques, and processes associated with the form(s), and (3) how imaginatively they can use the form to express an idea.
The program's launch was not without problems.
By the spring of 1994, the teachers who had worked on the development of the exercises had conducted pilot tests of the assessment tasks in their own classrooms.
The following spring, meetings were held to prepare teachers to administer the tasks.
The arts tasks were administered by teachers on an optional basis in the spring of 1996 and again in the spring of 1997.
(Teachers of mathematics, writing, and science were required to administer assessment tasks in these areas.)
Although arts teachers were not required to administer the assessment tasks, in the fifth grade approximately 35,000 students completed the task.
Issues pertaining to the scoring of students' responses and how the findings might be analyzed and presented to the public are still being developed.
Indeed, it is an enormous initiative for which there are few, if any, models to follow.
Nevertheless, the approach represents important advances, permitting students to respond to a task employing a preferred art form or forms, and the task itself simultaneously assesses many of the National Standards for Arts Education.
special programs that include the arts as an important component.
Different schools ­ regular as well as specialized schools ­ also offer a variety of curricular emphases, instructional approaches, and organizational structures.
No matter which kind of school this study's researchers visited in Milwaukee, they found the arts strong and hard at work.
In many respects, the MPS district seemed to bring to life the second goal of the National Standards for Arts Education, K-12 Teaching and Learning Goals: "Students will participate and gain knowledge in all of the arts (visual arts, dance, theater, literature, music), developing personal vehicles for self expression reinforced in an integrated curriculum."
While Milwaukee principals, teachers, and parents in each school have been given enormous latitude to develop the kinds of schools they desire, at the same time the district administrators and curriculum specialists, through their work in curriculum and assessment, send strong signals that all schools, regardless of their particular specializations, are expected to present balanced programs that include the arts.
Milwaukee can be seen as a selfrenewing system.
During the past few years, with a rapid turnover in superintendents, administrative support for the arts has varied somewhat.
Regardless of the level of support, the arts curriculum specialists continued to work with individual schools.
Some of the schools with exemplary arts programs continued to flourish in times when central support was weaker.
These schools continued to innovate and have provided exemplary models for other schools to follow.
In other words, the authority that resides both within schools and within central administration, although sometimes fluctuating between these two poles, insures that arts leadership and innovation remain within the Milwaukee Public Schools system and keeps the arts relatively strong throughout the entire system.
Milwaukee, this pattern of collaborative leadership pervades virtually every dimension of education and, in large measure, accounts for the strength of the district's arts programs.
Another important contributing factor in sustaining strong arts education programs is, of course, the commitment of the superintendent.
Today, Superintendent Alan S. Brown supports and articulates a vision for "one of the outstanding urban arts education programs in the world."
To that end, he is working to achieve "quality arts instruction for all children in the district which includes high standards and effective assessment" and "expansion of the highly successful artscentered schools and programs."
COORDINATING MORE WITH LESS n Milwaukee, visual arts and music curriculum supervisors have been and continue to be leaders nationally as well as in the state and district.
In recent years, however, budget reductions have left their mark on Milwaukee.
Like many other school districts around the country, MPS has reduced the size of its central office arts supervisory staff.
In the early 1980s, the central office art supervisory staff was large, with one art curriculum specialist, one art supervisor, and, at different times, anywhere from four to six supervising teachers of art who also worked from the district office.
Now there are just two curriculum specialists ­ one for art, the other for music ­ in the central office, while a second art specialist works in the Division of Curriculum and Instruction on programs relating to the arts and special education.
The resources of one art and one music supervisor are stretched thinly as they work to serve the needs of hundreds of visual arts and music teachers.
I
ADDING ARTS SPECIALISTS ilwaukee visual arts teachers report that they missed the close contact, opportunities for professional development, and instructional support they used to receive from the cadre of art supervisors.
However, while losing arts coordinators, the district was gaining art and music specialists in the elementary schools.
Once a few elementary schools began to add special arts teachers to their staffs, the arts cur-
M
COLLABORATIVE LEADERSHIP PS provides an excellent example of the advantages that come when leadership responsibilities are shared among individual schools and central district office administrators and curriculum specialists.
In
M
PAGE
28
MILWAUKEE'S ACE PROGRAM Arts in Community Education ­ ACE ­ is a comprehensive education partnership between the Milwaukee Symphony Orchestra and 25 private and parochial schools in eight school districts, including Milwaukee Public Schools.
ACE brings learning through music into the classroom every day, aiming to advance each child's overall learning and development.
ACE pursues that goal through a series of culturally diverse arts experiences that are integrated throughout the curriculum beginning in kindergarten and continuing through each grade level.
These experiences are structured around a coordinating theme for each grade.
For example, kindergartners learn about the "Family of Music" (composer, conductor, performer, audience) ­ a theme which emphasizes social development and the relationships found within all types of "families."
Third and fourth graders develop cultural awareness, sensitivity, and pride by exploring cultural heritages and crossinfluences found in communities worldwide (third grade) and in Wisconsin (fourth grade).
Fifth graders become "Ace Inventors" and explore interdependence in artistic and scientific processes and problem solving.
Supporting each theme, MSO provides an interdisciplinary curriculum, three or four in-school ensemble workshops per grade, an evening family concert at each school, a specially designed concert by the full orchestra for each grade level (parents invited), teacher in-services and summer curriculum planning workshops, and a parent newsletter.
An ambitious assessment component annually documents ACE's progress and effectiveness in achieving interdisciplinary and critical thinking, problem solving, self-esteem, self-confidence, motivation, cooperation, listening, communication, and creativity.
At the middle school level, ACE's emphasis broadens to encompass three areas: · integrating the arts across the school curriculum, bridging students' learning in academic subjects and the arts; · supporting schools' music and arts curricula through close contact with MSO musicians and other outstanding professional artists; · addressing school-to-work issues through broad access to MSO and other arts industry resources and personnel.
At the sixth-grade level, a team of two MSO musicians are designated to work with arts and academic faculty throughout the school year.
As partners, they plan and implement all program components, including ACE curriculum, artist visits, parent involvement, and assessment.
In 1998-99, 50 specially prepared ensembles and individual artists are making 400 presentations in ACE schools.
MSO musicians, conductor, and chorus comprise 22 of them.
Another 28 involve community "cultural partners," such as the American Indian Center, Ballet Wisconsin, Chance , Dancecircus, Discovery World Museum, and more.
Now in its ninth year, Arts in Community Education is funded by grants from the National Endowment for the Arts, GE Fund, Harley Davidson Foundation, Emory T. Clark Family Foundation, among many others.
APPLAUSE Milwaukee district's arts programs have received considerable local, state, national, even international attention.
Dutch educators are studying MPS's Elm Creative Arts School as a model for schools in the Netherlands.
Elm also was selected for a 1997 Business Week Award for Instructional Innovation.
Lincoln Center Middle School received the City of Milwaukee Award of Excellence for its collaborative programs involving students, educators, artists, and performing arts groups.
The Wisconsin Alliance for Arts Education recognized 10 Milwaukee elementary schools for their exemplary programs.
The Milwaukee Public Schools' arts programs were examined by researchers for Toward Civilization: A Report to the President and Congress on Arts Education (1988).
The Milwaukee visual arts program was studied in depth by the Rand Corporation and the Getty Education Institute for the Arts; the results were reported in Beyond Creating: The Place for Art in America's Schools (1985).
riculum supervisors were presented with the equity argument: "If specialists are good for some schools, why aren't they good for all schools?" Today all of Milwaukee's elementary schools, in addition to its middle and high schools, are served by art and music specialists.
It is noteworthy that the addition of art and music specialists to the elementary level was accomplished during the same time that much of the authority to establish educational programs was being transferred from the district to individual schools.
THE MILWAUKEE COMMUNITY: INSIDE AND OUTSIDE THE SCHOOLS
T
he Milwaukee community plays a critical and ongoing role from outside the school system (as advocates and funders) and from inside the system (through artist residencies and program partnerships).
MPS is developing new partnerships all the time.
Two stand out: the Milwaukee Symphony's ACE program (see sidebar) and the dis-
trict's collaboration with the Milwaukee Art Museum.
The museum partnership provides curriculum materials for teachers, junior docent programs, arts classes for teachers, and opportunities for in-class guest speakers and artists.
Through the Milwaukee Art Museum's new program with Lincoln Center Middle School of the Arts, spaces in the school have been designed as studio and performance spaces for community arts groups.
The school studios are "bartered" for artists' school programs.
Their studios are intermingled with classrooms throughout the school building, resulting in artist-student interactions all day, every day ­ an artist residency in the fullest sense.
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
29
A Case Study:
REDONDO BEACH (CA) Factors The Community The Superintendent A Cadre of Principals Parent/Public Relations National, State, Other Outside Forces Continuous Improvement
Statistics Schools (Total): 12 Students (Total): 7,255 Per Pupil: $4,800 Arts Teachers (Total): 47
THE LOCAL CONTEXT
O
ne of three adjacent middleincome "beach towns" south of Los Angeles International Airport and separate spiritually if not physically from L.A., Redondo Beach is, in many ways, a community caught in the middle.
Economically, an educator points out, we're "not rich enough to afford everything we need in education" ­ unlike extremely well-to-do neighbors ­ but "not disadvantaged enough to qualify for grant assistance"­ unlike other neighboring communities.
On average, a Redondo family has an income of $48,000.
The impact of immigration is beginning to be felt, and the number of Spanish-speaking families is on the rise.
Of the 7,255 students in Redondo Beach Unified School District, 38 percent are nonwhite; 8 percent live below the poverty line.
Redondo Beach Unified School District ­ until recently a K-8 district with a separate high school district ­ is a small system: one high school, one continuation high school, two middle schools, and eight elementary schools.
Historically, the school board has voted to sustain the arts - with just one major cut of the strings program during a hard budget time.
This commitment has not been easy to sustain in California, ever since Proposition 13 was passed more than a decade ago and made funding arts education difficult.
But Redondo Beach also has a history of capitalizing on its opportunities.
From the early days of its arts education renewal, Redondo Beach Unified School District has found partners to help the district create and sustain its arts education programs.
The City of Redondo Beach and its recreation department, for example, assisted the district in developing a K-6 vocal music instruction program.
Los Angeles' Getty Education Institute for the Arts provided teacher/administrator workshops that proved particularly effective in creating value and interest for integrating art production and analysis within the
classroom ­ to lasting effect.
Daily, the district reaps the benefit of its partnership with parents and grandparents who provide experiential arts education at the elementary level.
This volunteer effort has become institutionalized as the Hands on Art program.
Recently, new partnerships have begun shaping Redondo Beach's identity into a school system concerned with arts through the electronic media.
With this strategy, Redondo is answering the L.A. County Office of Education's call for content and establishing a 21st century vision for itself by developing partnerships and securing grants that support and advance the integration of arts and technology.
A SUPERINTENDENT'S VISION FOR HER DISTRICT'S 21ST CENTURY PARTNERSHIP: ARTS AND TECHNOLOGY t is not surprising that given the proximity of Los Angeles, numerous technology-based corporations, and the Hollywood film industry that there is high demand in the region for students prepared to pursue careers in the arts and entertainment.
Redondo Beach decided to seize the day and take community involvement to the "next level."
Pairing the arts and technology as "agents of change" is a strategy born of the well-tended connections to business and county leaders of the late superintendent of Redondo Beach, Dr. Beverly Rohrer.
A strong, vocal member of Arts Tech 100, a national arts advocacy group of businesses, organizations, educators, arts patrons, and others, she served on the California Department of Education Superintendent's Task Force on the Visual and Performing Arts.
The list below of Redondo's technology/arts initiatives ­ many of which have been underwritten by businesses ­ is testament to her vision and commitment to the Redondo Beach community and its children's futures.
COLLECTIVE IMPACT mong the initiatives above, this study's team of researchers, who spent several days in Redondo Beach, found a handful of rare gems and a few that were more common.
But the most important discovery was the collective impact of innovative work and the overall elevation of the level of learning and access to opportunity in this school district.
During the researchers' visit, Redondo Beach high school students were engaged in the Interstate Musical
A
I
Initiative ArtsEDNet, L.A. Cultural Arts Collaborative Arts Project
Partner Getty Education Institute for the Arts
Description District teachers trained in Discipline-Based Arts Education develop technology components and K-6 lessons for arts web sites under development.
K-16 students will use electronic communication to organize arts events involving the community.
To train teachers and communities in South Bay in integration of technology in educational reform.
Mac Lab for district graphic arts donated by families of two instructors.
District to provide county schools with assistance in integration of arts into curricula using technology.
Computer network established and run by students, serves 14 districts sites, city government, and all teachers and students; houses online collection of arts resources, including a teacher area of arts standards, lessons, assessments.
Boardwalk Art: Linking Arts, Culture and Community Futures Academy
City of Redondo Beach
TRW, GTE, Cal State, Dominguez Hills, NASA, Apple Computer, AT
CAD/Graphics Lab
Center for Excellence in Fine Arts
Los Angeles County Schools - Office of Superintendent, AT
Student-managed BeachNet housing Arts KnowledgeNetTM
PAGE
30
Principals, Parents, School Board Members: Providing a Firm Foundation for Innovation Redondo Beach did not venture into collaborations with high-tech firms and Hollywood without prior experience with partnerships and strong support at home.
Former and current school board members, parents and grandparents, and principals have woven a sort of safety net for arts education as the district explores the arts and technology connection.
Principals as Partners Redondo's emerging vision for the arts and technology stems in part from longstanding policies and programs aimed at providing "a comprehensive arts education program (which) includes a written, sequential curriculum in music and the visual arts" (July 6, 1993 board policy 6142.6).
The teacher/administrator workshops of Los Angeles' Getty Education Institute for the Arts have been particularly effective in creating a value and interest for integrating art production and analysis within the classroom.
Principals such as Dr. Jeffrey Bordofsky of Washington School still speak about their Getty training, although it may have taken place more than a decade ago.
(Bordofsky recently chose to save art classes and space during the classroom reduction movement by consolidating other support areas.)
Although the funds from its early Getty partnership have run out, Redondo Beach maintains an art mentor position, held by Elsie Shigeta, to continue to train educators in using Discipline-Based Arts Education (DBAE).
The reason principals are willing to devote teacher and administrator time to training ­ even though there are pressures to offer only math and reading ­ is that they have seen firsthand the successes of thematic learning.
Every principal has a different story to tell: One middle school principal used to dance with the San Francisco Ballet.
The principal of the continuation high school said art and madrigal singing were important parts of her own childhood education; dance was her college minor.
The principal of Tulita Elementary declared, "Art is a powerful connecting piece."
Because integrating arts into other subjects helps her teachers make connections with Redondo's large population of students with disabilities, she found ways to support arts education through Title 1 money.
Yet another principal had been transformed by a fingerpainting workshop for administrators.
Each Redondo Beach principal in his or her own way has a place for the arts ­ in personal life as well as in school.
It is this openness of the "gatekeepers" that helps arts education find its way into Redondo Beach classrooms in many different manners.
A Board Member's Music Stand Music has a strong board of education advocate in former president Valerie Dombrowski.
Her son, who has disabilities, found a niche in his Redondo schooling and in life through music.
"I want to bring back the string orchestra first," she says.
With the steel drum band a popular hit on the football field and the district taking over support for the vocal music program from the city partnership, the music program is gaining strength.
However, music teachers do not yet find sufficient resources and colleagues to feel fully supported.
Although Redondo elementary classroom teachers feel they are able to fully integrate the visual arts, they are still looking for ways to expand music.
Parents as Arts Teachers Parent involvement in the arts education at the elementary level has become institutionalized in a program called Hands on Art.
This grassroots program trains parent volunteers to make projects with a variety of visual arts materials.
The chairman of the program, Marilyn Scara, speaks about the attention to quality in parent-training ­ to the extent of ordering special brushes from overseas and securing donations of rice paper for an Asian art project.
Training is ongoing, and the parents enter into a long-term relationship with one or more elementary classes with their children and teach visual arts experiences for a project a month.
This program has been in place for years, with parents and grandparents taking the opportunity to develop a visual arts interest or even background and assist in their own child's education.
One grandmother volunteer has followed her four grandchildren over eight years of their schooling.
Theatre Project, an ambitious and complex undertaking that linked three other high schools ­ one in Texas, Northern California, and Illinois ­ with Redondo.
The 40 or so Redondo students in the project talked at length and in detail about the challenges of collaborating creatively across time and land barriers.
They described how they were video conferencing the far-flung classes in order to brainstorm.
E-mail and online chats were their avenues for jointly crafting the plot and script.
Through ongoing e-mail discussions, they jointly work with students from Texas.
The students employed MIDI technology to compose music, share and critique scores.
They found ways to adapt a time-honored tradition of creative collaboration using the tools of the future.
But ­ this part is important ­ it was not about the tools.
It was about the play, the give and take, meeting deadlines, surpassing boundaries, and glimpsing success.
In the process, the students learn from and with each other.
One Redondo senior and a pre-eminent MIDI musical composer (the school consults with him in development of MIDI classes) proudly shared with the researchers the promotional video of the production, which included a few bars of the song he was composing.
"It works, it really works, it's going to be great!" he exclaimed.
His fellow students warmly received this newest creation.
Soon after, the black box theater hummed with the expectant energy of auditioning.
It was clear who the writers were as they nodded their heads approvingly, listening to first interpretations.
What Redondo students were learning was the basics of creation, criticism, and performance.
How have they learned it? Interactively with students from around the country, using the tools technology has to offer.
When we asked the group of students why they cared so much about this
project, they responded overwhelmingly, "It's ours!" "It's our baby."
"We made this."
"We worked hard.
Collaboration isn't easy, but I can see the light at the end of the tunnel!" Simultaneously, in the three other communities, classes were gearing up, casting parts, making their contributions to the collaborative original production which was to receive its premiere performance in Redondo a month later.
Deborah Johns and Paul Collette, the theater instructional team behind the initiative, confided that the endeavor had been more difficult than they had originally imagined.
It was also proving more rewarding.
The time and overtime this group of Redondo students and teachers were putting into the interactive production seemed to be nothing in comparison to their belief in the project and in themselves: They were breaking new ground and changing the face of learning.
continued on next page
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
31
Bringing Adult Education into the Schools Brings Good Things to Art
T
he Redondo district collaborates with its neighboring beach districts to offer evening classes at the South Bay Adult School on school grounds.
Classes range from Basic Skills and Parent Education to Crafts 
Basic skills classes such as English as a Second Language considered a "mandated" class can be offered free to the public.
Adults are charged a fee for arts courses.
The presence of this after-hours arts education on school grounds benefits the K-12 students in a number of ways: ½ Shared Resources: Interest from the adult education TV Production Workshop, for example, led to an increased demand for equipment, and the eventual acquisition of a video production studio now shared with the Redondo high school students.
½ Shared Personnel: The assistant principal of the Adult School also spearheads development of Redondo High School's Center for the Advancement of Art and Entertainment (CAAE).
Her talents as an administrator help spread her value of the arts within the district structure and to the community at large.
½ New Arts Advocates: Many of the students in the adult education classes seem to be older than parents with school children.
These adults without children speak highly of their arts experiences and their communities.
Individuals who value the arts are ripe for mobilizing in support of the arts in local schools.
As in every new venture, there are risks: The district may discover its varied approach makes it more difficult for students to systematically build certain skills as defined by the traditional fine arts K-12 curriculum.
At the same time, there may be gains: a town meeting full of business people who are partners for technology first, but also for the arts; a license to experiment; students interested, excited, and skilled in doing creative things with technology; and access to resources for the arts that might not be available any other way.
A LEADERSHIP CHALLENGE
T
here is another challenge Redondo Beach faces ­ a challenge every school district faces at one time or another: change in leadership.
Redondo's present and future leaders must build upon the strengths of consensus and value for the arts in education that Beverly Rohrer helped the community develop.
A Case Study:
DISCOVERING WHAT WORKS ot every endeavor succeeds equally well.
Redondo's Discovery Lab, for example, was established as "a career-to-work modular lab based upon Dr. Howard Gardner's theory of seven intelligences."
The lab provides students with tools to help create and manipulate graphics, write interactive screen plays, and aurally compose music.
Students interface with computers and their ideas, but not necessarily with each other or the teacher.
Using Gardner's intelligences model, the Discovery Lab program is missing the kinesthetic (movement) and interpersonal (person-to-person communication) intelligences.
Students working with the lab are learning important skills for the 21st century.
The question is whether they are acquiring an education in the arts.
The challenge for Redondo Beach ­ and, in the future, for thousands of school districts across America ­ is learning how to connect the arts to new media while still teaching the basics of the original artistic disciplines.
N
A NEW TRACK FOR ARTS AND TECHNOLOGY
VANCOUVER (WA) Factors Statistics Schools (Total): 33 The Community Students (Total): 19,000 The School Board Per Pupil: $6,043 The Superintendent District Arts Coordinator(s) Arts Teachers (Total): 129 A Cadre of Principals Parent/Public Relations Opportunities for Higher Levels of Achievement Planning Continuous Improvement
T
eachers, administrators, and students in Redondo Beach have all played a role in the development of a new track within Redondo Union High Schools called the Center for the Advancement of Art and Entertainment (CAAE).
It is designed to offer specialized study in film, computer graphics and art, computer-aided design and animation, musical theater, MIDI music, CD production, and broadcasting, among other areas.
In each area of study, students are expected to meet standards in "Artistic Perception, Creative Expression, Historical and Cultural Context, and Aesthetic Valuing" to complete a specialization.
THE LOCAL CONTEXT
V
AN ELEMENT
OF
RISK
n the face of the financial challenges presented by the State of California, Redondo's strategy is to merge arts with technology, then turn the district into a resource for others.
No other district visited by the study's researchers demonstrated such an entrepreneurial spirit, with a portfolio of "proprietary" ideas ready to market.
I
ancouver, Washington ­ a suburb of Portland, Oregon, and not to be confused with Vancouver, British Columbia ­ was once a thriving shipbuilding center.
Some 70,000 ship workers built 80 ships here during World War II.
But in 1989, scores of manufacturing plants closed, and 15,000 high-wage, mostly union jobs disappeared.
As a result, Vancouver family incomes plummeted.
The average household's income loss ­ real, not adjusted ­ was $5,000 over the previous decade's income.
Consequently, the number of students receiving free and reduced lunch skyrocketed from 12 to 49 percent.
Adding to the local economic troubles, the Vancouver school district faced the need to repair at least 27 older school buildings.
PAGE
32
Curiously, it was the need to address facility rehabilitation that sparked Vancouver's educational reform and, in turn, spurred the community's economic revitalization.
· Consensus Leads to Strategic Goals and District Reorganization With consensus of vision developing among the community, the school board, and the superintendent, Vancouver began shaping these specific, measurable, achievable goals: 1.
Revitalization of the Curriculum 2.
Preparation of Staff for the 21st Century 3.
Rehabilitation of Facilities 4.
Community Partnerships The emerging consensus also provided a foundation for the kind of sweeping administrative changes that would be needed to implement Vancouver's vision.
In 1990, the district eliminated 24 central office positions and reconstituted operations.
Weekly school board meetings moved to alternating agendas: Every other week the board meets on fiscal matters; at alternate meetings, it addresses the strategic plan and monitors all the systems and roles.
The superintendent's role, in particular, underwent significant change in this period.
As Dr. Parsley explained, "I became the 'planner' for the school district.
Half my time and title was moved over into the area of strategic planning.
By my heading up this effort, we eliminated about 10 layers of bureaucracy between planning and the decisions of the board."
How Business Sees Arts and Academics in Vancouver Hewlett-Packar d, the largest employer in Clark County, has a Community Action Plan with five platforms, two of which ar e K-12 Education and Arts and Cultur e. "W e have a r eal inter est in the quality of life," said HewlettPackar d education r e pr esentative Doug Sessions.
"It dir ectly r e lates to our ability to attract the best and brightest engineers in the country."
A high school principal and long-time member of the community, Sessions was hir ed away to connect the cultur e of work and the cultur e of education and "translate messages between them."
V i siting Vancouver's Arts and Academics school, he noted, "The inter d isciplinary appr oach to instruction, the pr oject-oriented focus, the sense that students ar e working in teams, collaborating, and, too, the high expectations in terms of the cor e subject ar eas, that's something that comes thr ough.
You know, you don' t have to be her e very long to see that ther e's an ethic of high performance.
It's kind of an unusual place for Hewlett-Packar d to look for math and science achievement, but the whole package is her e.
That's what we want.
That's the way our employees work."
HOW VANCOUVER ACHIEVED CONSENSUS OF VISION · The School Board Challenges the Superintendent Changes in the Vancouver school system have been directed by its superintendent of 18 years, Dr. James Parsley.
Yet he is the first to point out that the call for education reform came not from him but from the Vancouver Board of Education.
It was 1989, and Dr. Parsley had just presented to the school board his annual report summarizing the previous year's activities and making a recommendation for facilities repairs.
"I can remember," Jim Parsley recalled, "my board president taking the report and tossing it across the table and saying, 'All it talks about is bricks and mortar.
All this talks about is asphalt and roofs.
There's no vision in this.
There's no direction.
There's nothing in here for kids.
I want and expect a strategic plan for the school district.'"
· The Superintendent Connects With the Community Superintendent Parsley met the board's challenge, but not by turning to his staff to write a strategic plan.
Instead, he turned to the community of Vancouver and engaged the citizens in developing a plan that would belong to them.
"Our first effort," he told this study's team of researchers/reporters, "was to connect with the community on coming up with a vision and a mission statement.
We had a steering group of 80 key citizens ­ parents, business leaders, students, some faculty, a couple of board members ­ who involved 800 people in a series of town hall meetings.
It was there that we started making connections to a broader picture of public education.
Through parent groups we started hearing advocates for what the district would have to do to get ready for the 21st century.
All of a sudden the lights started to come on.
Our four critical strategic goals emerged from that process."
HOW GOALS WERE SET AND MET
W
hat would Vancouver have to do to get their children ready for the 21st century? This was the question that drove the community's discussions on education reform and ultimately shaped its four goals.
Goal 1: Revitalization of the Curriculum -- "What's important?" Vancouver residents asked themselves.
"What do we want to emphasize, what do we want to preserve, what do we want to strengthen?" According to the superintendent, initial strategic planning around revitalization of the curriculum led to some raging debates.
One debate involved the role of the arts in education.
"We had people who were engineers from the high tech companies," he explained, "who were saying, 'Wipe out the arts.
We don't need them.
We need math.
We need this, we need that.'"
It was
another issue ­ choice ­ that helped to focus the arts issue.
"All of a sudden," said Dr. Parsley, "the arts surfaced not from the point of view of someone saying, 'Oh, I like the arts' or 'I've had experienced in the arts' but really from looking at the kinds of kids we serve and knowing that the light can come on for some kids through the arts.
That was an 'Aha!'" Goal 2: Staff Development -- Vancouver determined through its planning process that if it were to be prepared for the 21st century, then the district needed staff up to the challenge.
That decision eventually led to the commitment of an unprecedented $8 million in staff development and the creation of Vancouver's Center for Leadership, a special staff training and development center.
Last year alone, nearly 30,000 people participated in its programs.
Goal 3: Facilities Rehabilitation -- While the school board's response to continued on next page
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
33
Dr. Parsley's original annual report served to focus attention on the need for a strategic plan, it did not eliminate the need to do something about dilapidated buildings and the funds to fix them.
Given the economic realities of Vancouver and the fact that only 26 percent of the voters had school-aged children, opposition to two key bond issues was anticipated.
Once again, the school leaders tapped the 800 community members who had helped shape the Vancouver vision and enlisted their help in educating the electorate.
Meanwhile, educators and parents "went all over town," said Dr. Parsley, "and we brought kids with us.
We met in front of Rotary, and we told our story.
If it was a music story, we had kids as part of the presentation.
I probably spoke to 40 or 50 different service clubs," he added.
The bond issues passed overwhelmingly ­ with 70-some percent of the voters approving funding for 27 construction projects.
How does a community that is not affluent "buy in" to education reform of this scope? Jim Parsley credits the community's involvement in the strategic initiatives and a hopeful vision of the future: "People said, 'I want that dream.'"
Goal 4: Community Partnership -- With the community's backing of the vision and the funding needed for facilities in place, school leaders systematically began seeking out and engaging organizations and individuals of substantial means.
The district developed partnerships with locally based corporations, such as HewlettPackard Company, Inc., and with donors, such as Leslie Durst, whose leadership gifts to Vancouver arts education stem from her arts-rich childhood in New York City.
Today, Vancouver schools benefit from an educational foundation which maintains approximately $1 million in assets, spending interest income on children's education needs, from musical instruments for needy students to travel funds for competitions.
School district employees' payroll deductions ­ in addition to United Way checkoffs ­ amount to 25 percent of the foundation's annual revenue.
HOW VANCOUVER IMPLEMENTED ITS PLAN n 1989, Portland's loss was Vancouver's gain when Superintendent Jim Parsley hired a talented dance educator who had served as head of Portland's
I
arts magnet school.
Deborah Brzoska's own vision proved a fine fit with Vancouver's; she espoused "All the arts for all the students" in elementary school, and she advocated a specialized secondary school for the arts as one of the district's "choice" options.
· Elementary Arts for All Prior to Deb Brzoska's arrival, Vancouver already had an "ArtsBlock" firmly in place as part of the tapestry of education offered to each elementary school student.
Brzoska sought to expand and enhance the program.
She helped ensure that "elementary arts" included dance, visual arts, and music taught by specialists by bringing in practicing artists/educators trained at Stanford, Columbia, and Juilliard.
· A Specialized Arts School for Secondary Choice At the secondary level, the Vancouver community's demand for "choice" shapes the schools.
The school district's vision is for every high school to have a focus.
Science and technology, arts and academics, international baccalaureate, and individualized education plans have already been created; health is on its way.
For the arts, Brzoska envisioned a school fed by the entire K-12 district.
The newly emerging Vancouver School of Arts and Academics brings together a group of 600 students selected by interest ­ not talent ­ to learn in an arts-centered curriculum.
With assistance from the College Board, the Getty Education Institute for the Arts, and a board of community members, Brzoska and other educators are creating a school starting at the sixth grade with arts teaching and experiences truly at the core.
Every staff member ­ from janitors to secretaries, teachers to administrators ­ has an arts interest or activity.
The highly charged educators wrangle daily with the evolution of the school and the breadth of its focus.
In the "academic" half of the day, the math, science, and language teachers use their own arts knowledge to teach in an integrated manner.
Howard Gardner's theory of "multiple intelligences" is frequently mentioned regarding the modes of learning and their choices of environments.
Meanwhile, other high schools in the district offer the arts in others ways.
For example, in the new, architectural award-winning Skyview high school, which focuses on science and
technology, the arts are slated to play an important role, thanks largely to Principal Rich Larson's values and the opportunity presented by facility reform.
Skyview's performing facilities are the largest in the town, and local arts groups are already scheduling their seasons around its use.
Other high schools offer the arts in more traditional ways, such as participation in marching bands which perform competitively and become part of a school's identity along with its sports teams.
At the Vancouver Personalized Learning Center, where students all have individualized learning programs, there is an ad hoc theater improvisation group that formed out of student and teacher interest, not systemic support.
HOW TEACHERS, PARENTS, AND ADMINISTRATORS VIEW VANCOUVER'S CHANGES
T
oday in Vancouver, elementary schools give broad-based arts experiences.
The middle schools provide varying levels of experiences with a "wheel of study" designed for exposure and electives ranging from choir to drama.
The high schools also have a range of programs, including some very strong traditional music, art, and drama.
Then there is the Vancouver School of Arts and Academics, which embraces dance, creative writing, film, and video.
The district's challenge is to balance broad exposure and high standards with focused opportunities.
A town meeting with parents, students, teachers, school board members, and administrators helped this study's researchers better understand how Vancouver grapples with its new direction.
There is some tension between teachers who have one foot in the "arts school" and those who do not.
A number of board members pointed out that some students still will want the arts in a "balanced environment" in which they can also cheerlead or do sports.
(The Arts and Academics high school takes students through a rigorous extra-period school day and does not offer sports.)
Everyone agreed that planning for change is best.
"Start with where the people are," said one teacher.
"Build the trust, respect, and leave time to plan."
And, Dr. Parsley, added later, "Deliver on your promises.
That builds credibility with the community."
PAGE
34
A Case Study:
WYOMING (OH) Factors Statistics Schools (Total): 3 The Community Students (Total): 1,800 The School Board Per Pupil: $6,700 The Superintendent Continuity in Leadership Arts Teachers (Total): 15 District Arts Coordinator(s) Opportunities for Higher Levels of Achievement
On Thursday, February 5, 1998, it snowed steadily for a second day, resulting in the heaviest snowfall ever recorded in the Cincinnati, Ohio, area.
The night before, in the suburb of Wyoming, Superintendent Ted Knapke had canceled school for that day.
Researchers visiting the community on behalf of the President's Committee on the Arts and the Humanities and the Arts Education Partnership figured they would have to reschedule the evening town meeting on arts education.
That proved unnecessary: More than 150 Wyoming citizens drove or walked through falling snow on mostly unplowed streets and sidewalks to talk with them.
them without school-age children.
Per capita income hovers around $30,000.
Unemployment is low.
Housing costs are higher in Wyoming than in other parts of the region, but many a parent has been willing to pay the price in order to access the local schools.
There are only three schools in this 2.57square-mile district: the elementary school with plus or minus 690 students, the middle school with 580, and the high school with 530.
Just about everyone who lives in Wyoming, the researchers learned, seems to be proud of the schools.
People used words and phrases like "high expectations," "quality," "rigor," "caring," "distinctive," "excellent," and "a sense of mission."
It's fair to say that the character of the community is substantially defined by a system-wide education program of which the arts are a prized part.
Food for Thought: "Communities of Practice" After visiting Wyoming, Ohio, and Vancouver, Washington, Superintendent Paul Williams reflected on the "constructivist nature of these school districts ­ how they have constructed meaning, purpose, etc. within the values of the visionary, leader, or community" and on the role of the arts in that process.
He sees them as "communities of practice," based upon the theory and philosophy of Etienne Wenger and Jean Lavé presented in their 1991 book Situated Learning (Cambridge University Press) and more recently developed in Wenger's Communities of Practice: Learning, Meaning and Identity (Cambridge University Press, August 1998).
From his readings of Wenger and Lavé and his firsthand observations of arts education in Vancouver, Washington, and Wyoming, Ohio, Dr. Paul Williams reflected on the findings.
Williams writes (and cites Wenger): · A community of practice has these elements: joint enterprise, negotiated enterprise, accountability, rhythms, local response.
· Sometimes the community creates the school, and other places the school creates the community.
In other communities, schools are the principal means for community identification.
· Learning is the engine of practice, and practice is the history of that learning.
· Communities of practice are different from task forces and working groups.
. . .
Based on joint learning rather than defined tasks that begin and end, a community of practice takes a while to come into being, and it can linger long after an official group is disbanded.
· The arts can be an impetus for a self-organizing system because systemic change needs to be bedded in uncertainty and a bit of chaos.
· The arts permit the teachers to break rules of stratified thinking.
BUILDING A "COMMUNITY OF PRACTICE"
S
W
hat was it about Wyoming and arts education that would produce such a good turnout in such bad weather? Dr. Paul Williams, the superintendent of Beachwood (OH) City Schools and one of the visitors to Wyoming for this study, came to believe that the development of arts in Wyoming, Ohio ­ as well as in Vancouver, Washington ­ was through "communities of practice."
(See sidebar, also Vancouver case study.)
"We found," he wrote, "that these communities practiced advanced arts education.
In Wyoming, the arts were developed within congruent values of the larger community.
The motivation came from the parents, grandparents, and citizens of the district."
Situated on the outskirts of Cincinnati, Wyoming is a landlocked community of some 8,000 people and 3,300 households, 60 to 70 percent of
tudents who grow up in middle and upper middle class homes generally do better than those less advantaged.
In Wyoming, most students have advantages that come from the things that money can buy ­ travel, computers, cultural events ­ and those money can't buy ­ parents who graduated from college, who have books in their homes, who expect their children to work hard, and who monitor the children's progress.
In such an environment, how to provide equity and opportunity for the less advantaged can become the kind of challenge that divides communities.
In this community of practice, Wyoming's citizens seized upon a problem and, in seeking a solution, developed a strategy for all students' success.
When Wyoming school leaders observed not long ago that a higher than average percentage of minority students were achieving below the rest of the students, they turned to the community's black leaders and said, "We need your help."
Intervention programs soon were developed and implemented with the support of ministers, civic leaders, parents, teachers, administrators, and students who were enlisted to help lower-achieving students.
The outcome is, in the words of one board member, "a bottom end that has shifted up."
continued on next page
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
35
LEADERSHIP'S CONSENSUS AND CONTINUITY
T
he Wyoming school board has found community consensusbuilding to be a very productive strategy.
The board seeks to know the collective mind of Wyoming's citizens and to work to resolve issues before they become serious enough to divide the community.
Its members also take an active interest in the courses of study for each school subject, having new curriculum guides, for example, presented at special board meetings.
The actions of the five-person board are usually unanimous.
A sense of stability and continuity also comes from the superintendent's office, where the occupants tend to stay for a long time.
In fact, only eight superintendents ­ averaging 15 and a half years' service each ­ have served in the Wyoming school system since it was founded in 1874.
For most of the past 124 years, the superintendents have stood firmly in support of the arts.
Wyoming's current superintendent, Ted Knapke, who is in his third year with the district, avidly seeks to sustain and enlarge the role of the arts in the education of the whole child.
He is building upon the same philosophy that guided his predecessor, Robert Yearout.
"The arts in Wyoming are a central part of the total program, not an aside," Yearout observed.
"I never thought of art and music as any less vital than any other part of the program.
One time [because of budget problems] we moved to cut the fourth-grade strings program.
The community came down on our heads."
receive a surprisingly high number of awards and scholarships for a small district.
Indeed, it was the success of Wyoming's visual arts students in regional and national competitions that first brought the district to the attention of the President's Committee.
CREATING A CULTURE OF SUCCESS
S
STUDENTS' ACHIEVEMENT
T
hat community includes a vitally important constituency: the students themselves.
More than 90 percent of Wyoming's high school students go on to college and most of them have been active in the arts.
Football players, for example, have been known to march with the band at half-time ­ in their football uniforms.
From 75 to 80 music students ­ 15 percent of the student body ­ willingly return in the evenings for full orchestra rehearsals.
Many high school students take Advanced Placement courses in the arts.
In music and visual arts competitions, Wyoming students perform with distinction and
uccess is grown in Wyoming.
In the arts programs ­ where the music and visual arts are taught in separate courses, and creative writing is integrated throughout the curriculum ­ the quality of teaching and learning begins at the beginning, in kindergarten, and continues to build through graduation.
Alison Youkilis is the high school art instructor/district art coordinator.
She explains, "Our elementary art program has always been in place, and we work at making sure that any and every student feels that he/she can take art and music classes and be successful.
Often, too, our kids are going all the way, K-12, through our schools.
So our educators are able to build on each others' work."
In grades K-8, 100 percent of the students participate in music and the visual arts.
In grades 9-12, nearly 70 percent of the students elect to participate in the arts programs.
Every student (K-4) receives at least 60 minutes of visual art and 60 minutes of music instruction each week.
String instruction begins the second half of fourth grade, band and vocal music in fifth grade.
Middle schoolers are required to receive 100 minutes per week of visual arts instruction and 125 minutes of music.
In high school, the music offerings are rich, and the rewards for students come in the form of scholarships, superior and excellent ratings in all-state competitions, invitations to participate in Cincinnati Junior Strings, Cincinnati Youth Symphony, and the Youth Chorus of the annual May Festival.
Many have gone on to careers in music; many more have gone forth with success as vocational musicians and as future patrons of the arts.
The visual arts program serves to illustrate how Wyoming builds its curriculum from one level and course to another.
In the eighth grade, for example, Wyoming students begin to learn photography starting with a shoe box.
They make a pinhole camera, take a
series of photographs based on a theme, develop negatives, make prints, and mount and bind their photographs in a small handmade book.
When these same students begin their first photography course in the high school, they do so with a solid understanding of photography.
In high school, they use a variety of cameras and printing processes before they move to the computer where they can manipulate their photographs using digital technology.
Seniors at Wyoming High School are required to take four academic subjects during their final year, and Advanced Placement art counts as an academic subject.
This, according to high school art instructor Alison Youkilis, is another one of the reasons why bright students are attracted to art.
ADVANCED PLACEMENT'S WELCOME CHALLENGE
T
he College Board's Advanced Placement program in the visual arts has been an important factor in making the high school studio art programs rigorous and substantial.
Students, usually seniors (juniors in some schools, such as Wyoming High School) work for a year to develop a body of work consisting of up to 20 pieces representing a range of media and ideas.
Students' portfolios are judged each summer at the Educational Testing Service in Princeton, New Jersey.
Rated on a five-point scale, students who score three or above qualify for advanced placement in colleges and universities.
In other words, if they choose to major in art, they are not required to take basic college art courses.
Approximately half of the nation's high schools currently offer Advanced Placement courses.
Students in these schools may select from among 18 subjects ­ although not all schools offer all subjects.
Advanced Placement courses are seen as a means to challenge students with rigorous content and high standards.
Schools are even evaluated according to the percentage of students who are permitted to take Advanced Placement courses and submit their work for examination.
One of the AP courses ­ Photography ­ is the direct result of student interest and initiative.
Youkilis explains, "It came from the kids.
One
PAGE
36
"The Middle Man" ­ An Important Principal to Remember
W
ithout that middle school arts program bridging students' elementary and high school studies, would a school system's arts education still be strong and effective? Where, for example, would Wyoming be today if middle school principal Brandon Cortes had not met an art teacher who wouldn't take "no" for an answer? Brandon Cortes' office displays a reproduction of a painting by American artist Keith Haring, who gained his initial fame by making chalk drawings in New York subway stations on the kind of black tarpaper that's used to back empty poster frames.
The principal purchased it during a visit to a Haring exhibition in Toronto.
Cortes' interest in art and the power of art to educate took root several years ago when one of Wyoming's middle school visual arts teachers asked him to add a visit to the Art Institute to the itinerary of the annual school trip to Chicago.
"Why would we want to do that?" he remembered asking her, thinking that students' interest in art would be no greater than his own and imagining with horror the problems
that he and the teachers would have controlling disgruntled students who didn't want to be in an art museum.
So he rejected the visit.
Immediately, the art teacher sent him an e-mail message protesting, "You are undercutting everything I stand for, everything I have been trying to teach."
Cortes changed his mind and the Art Institute has become a regular stop on the Chicago itinerary.
During the 199798 trip, 60 of the 100 students elected to visit the Art Institute.
Brandon Cortes is good at listening to the views of others.
He has created an 18-member "Envisioning Committee" composed of parents and teachers who meet monthly to ask "Where are we going?" Among the issues discussed are curriculum, the climate and culture of the school, and even a radical proposal to discontinue administering standardized tests in favor of authentic and performance-based assessment procedures developed by teachers.
One outcome of the process is a proposal prepared by a teacher to move the school's instructional pro-
gram toward tasks that students see as benefiting them through meaningful applications to their lives (and not just fulfilling the wishes of parents, teachers, or the system).
It calls for comprehensive, issues-based instructional units, jointly planned and presented by teams of teachers representing each subject area.
The arts teachers, Cortes noted, play an essential role in each of the integrated units ­ something he didn't understand very well a few years ago.
Brandon Cortes' lesson in the arts is simple: If school administrators are to understand the role that the arts can play in students' lives, they may have to begin by learning more about the role the arts play in their own lives.
ARTS A
GAINING THE DVANTAGE
day the students said to me, 'Why can't we have AP Photography like we have AP Studio Art?' So I went to the phone and called the AP organization, and they said that as long as the children did the required drawings and sculpture, then we could do it.
So then I had to go back and convince the administration to create AP Photography, and the next year 13 kids signed up!" The visual arts program at Wyoming High School ranks very high.
In the 1998 graduating class of 90, nearly 19 percent ­ 17 students ­ submitted Advanced Placement art portfolios.
An additional seven junioryear students also submitted portfolios.
This is an astonishing percentage, more remarkable still in light of the fact that every portfolio ever submitted
by a Wyoming High School student has received a passing grade.
The reason so many students enjoy the Advanced Placement Art challenge, explains Youkilis, is that "Advanced Placement forces high school students to look at their work as a unit rather than just as individual pieces.
AP means looking for a style, a theme, a direction.
AP demands that you understand what you are saying.
Students write essays about their portfolios; they have to explain why they have undertaken a particular theme.
For example, one girl who received a 5 ­ the highest score ­ explored the struggles of an anorexic friend, with the friend's permission."
As for the teacher, Youkilis feels that "you relate to AP students differently because they have undertaken a
real task.
You get to know these kids on an emotional level.
It's the portfolio, the discipline, the rigor, the visual search and the `I Search' paper they write to explain their portfolios that will probably change their lives."
For many it has.
Between 40 to 50 of Youkilis' students have become graphic designers, and 25 to 30 have become photographers.
Others are filmmakers, fashion designers, art teachers, and jewelry makers.
There is something else the students get in the AP art courses: a place and space in time to think, create, and relate.
Says Youkilis, "Their art class is their oasis in the day.
The kids listen to the radio, talk to each other, talk with us teachers.
Either they think I'm a deaf mute or they are just free continued on next page
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
37
enough to talk around me about what's on their minds or going on in their lives.
Sometimes, it puts you on the spot."
According to a student, "It's like a team - the AP team.
And teachers really care.
They give support for what you want to do."
Adds Youkilis, "It's so thrilling to learn so much from my students.
And to see them learn.
But you do have to be willing to walk the kids through the AP arts process.
I've never had a kid who didn't make it, though, and with fewer than 500 kids in the school, we have a smaller base to pull from than do schools of 3,000 students.
We've been so lucky with the performance of our children, because other kids see art students winning contests and the like and say to themselves, 'There's a chance that I, too, can perform at that level.'"
Looking Ahead: What's the Connection Between High School and Higher Learning "This is my twenty-fifth year in the classroom," Alison Youkilis confessed, then quickly added, "I hope this is the beginning rather than the end.
There are universities that want to work with high schools.
Institutions of higher learning could help us open a whole new concept with computer graphics.
We have the children and the interest and the expertise.
So I've been canvassing and talking with universities, asking, 'What do you expect my students to have in terms of knowledge and skills when they come to you?' We are finding something really positive there."
THE REAL WORLD'S CHALLENGES or the Wyoming City Schools district and its arts education departments to maintain their current level of performance requires the same kind of creativity and discipline that its students demonstrate.
Ted Knapke says that one of the greatest challenges he faces as superintendent is providing the level of programs and resources needed to meet the community's expectations when the tax base isn't high enough to sustain it.
"Our income tax base is high," he says, "but education in Ohio is based heavily on property tax, and in that respect, we're an average district.
We have no malls, no real industry.
So we ask our parents to help pay for the extras.
Our teachers write grants.
We go to businesses for equipment or help through partnerships.
We go to the voters for money."
Knapke believes that Wyoming is fortunate to have a community that continues to reach in its pocket to make high quality education possible.
But he sees a nationwide problem in the point of view that even without adequate funding any community can create a strong school system that includes the arts.
"There is a phrase ­ 'Do more with less' ­ that unfortunately translates into 'Get rid of the things you don't need.'
In a lot of communities what people think they don't need is the arts."
F
Knapke adds, "I'm hopeful and optimistic that the research that's been conducted in the last 10 years will help make the case that you can't expect children to do well in the `basics' without having the full experience of education, including the arts.
If our children are going to be involved in using information and solving problems, then just teaching
arithmetic and reading isn't enough.
We need to stress the whole child, the whole package.
Some 30 percent of the kids in this country live in poverty: How do you motivate them to do reading and writing when their schools are the ones that are the first to cut the arts whenever costs go up.
And they are the ones who most need the arts, because the arts get the kids involved with school and learning.
"That's something," Knapke concludes, "I would hope legislators and other leaders would work to change."
"It does take money for art to happen," adds Alison Youkilis.
"In order to do photography, you have to have a camera and photo paper.
This gets to one of the most unfortunate parts of public education: that because money is so minimal, we as teachers are afraid to dream and afraid to do it and go and reach the next level."
Youkilis concluded on a note of optimism ­ "If you dream it enough and long enough and say it to the right people, it happens."
But in her comments, in Ted Knapke's assessment, and in many citizens' remarks, there is a recognition of the fragility of arts systems.
The Wyoming community seems to appreciate that consensus must be maintained with vigilance, and that no place is perfect.
Wyoming is part of the real world where there is always more to be done.
"I'm hopeful and optimistic that the research that's been conducted in the last 10 years will help make the case that you can't expect children to do well in the `basics' without having the full experience of education, including the arts . . ."
ARTS A
GAINING THE DVANTAGE
PAGE
38
SCHOOL DISTRICT PROFILES A Profile:
ANCHORAGE (AK) Factors Statistics Schools (Total): 89 The Community National, State, and Other Students (Total): 48,066 Per Pupil: $7,788 Outside Forces Arts Teachers (Total): 192
L
ocated near the Matsu Valley and the Kenai Peninsula, Anchorage is the largest city in Alaska.
Its school district ranks as the 82nd largest school district in the country, and it serves approximately 48,000 students in 89 schools.
In the past few years, the district has organized 11 community budget committees to review all school programs.
This practice has led to greater awareness of the district's strong arts programs, and, after the request of one committee to cut arts funding, the superintendent rejected the recommendation while electing to maintain all support for arts education.
Each year the school district pays for release time for about 20 school district employees who play in the Anchorage Symphony.
In return, the symphony supplies buses to transport several hundred students to a "Young People's Concert" performed during the school day.
For six years, the school district of Anchorage, Alaska, has worked in partnership with the Alaska Center for the Performing Arts to build a strong cooperative arts education program largely through staff development.
That partnership has helped to spawn other initiatives in Alaska and to serve as a model for partnerships around the nation.
The school district-performing arts center collaboration was solidified when the two organizations came together to assist the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts with the planning of an arts educationfocused Alaskan residency for its National Symphony Orchestra.
Out of that effort came a National Symphony Orchestra "American Residencies" program, an expanded Kennedy Center Performing Arts Centers and Schools: Partners in Education Program, and, in Anchorage, a continuing program of activities for Anchorage teachers.
Today, the Anchorage School District-Alaska Center for the Performing Arts partnership each year offers both arts specialists and classroom teachers workshops at which artists help teachers explore new ways to engage youngsters in the classroom.
The partnership also provides special discounted tickets for teachers to attend performances and pre- or post-lectures.
Teachers who enroll in the program earn two graduate credits for attending 30 hours of events or one credit for attending 15 hours.
Earning a "B" grade requires submitting a certificate of attendance and a journal of comments and summaries of the events attended.
For an "A," teachers complete the "B" requirements and, additionally, create a set of five lesson plans (eight for two credits) that incorporates arts activities derived from the arts events.
The fees are $75 for one credit, $150 for two.
For the 1997-98 workshops, attended by 68 Anchorage teachers, topics ranged from cowboy poetry, stories, and songs for incorporation in units on the American West to basic rules of improvisation.
The pre- and post-performance events included an insider's view of the Anchorage Opera's winter productions and a review of a materials packet for teachers that accompanies the Symphony's "Young People's Concert" for area fifth graders.
The Anchorage community and the schools collaborate in other productive ways.
For example, the staff of a local museum and several district teachers came together in a curriculum committee which developed a teacher instructional activity packet designed to help teachers prepare students for field trips to the museum's permanent Alaskan exhibit.
It supports both the arts and the social studies curricula in the schools.
G
A Profile:
ANN ARBOR (MI) Factors The Community Continuity in Leadership Planning Continuous Improvement
Statistics Schools (Total): 30 Students (Total): 15,874 Per Pupil: $7,981 Arts Teachers (Total): 106
T
he Ann Arbor School District ­ located in a university town 40 miles from Detroit ­ has benefited greatly from 20 years of ongoing arts
advocacy by community and school leaders.
This sustained support has helped to advance full access to the arts for all students, teacher training, curriculum integration, and the arts through technology.
In Ann Arbor, a district that is especially strong in music education, the commitment to arts access for all students may be most evident in the fifth grade.
All fifth-grade students ­ approximately 1,260 in 1998 ­ learn how to play a musical instrument.
Participation in the program for all students is possible because the district provides instruments and supplies to all students at no charge.
The vast majority of students choose to continue their music studies, encouraged by the district's 58 music specialists.
Many of the answers to questions of access in the Ann Arbor district have been provided by community partnerships.
A cooperative outreach tutorial program, which the district funds with the help of a local business association, allows many students who could not otherwise afford it to receive private lessons throughout the year from music teachers in the community.
Scholarships contributed by the district annually send more than 20 students to the summer allstate program at the Interlochen Center for the Arts.
Additional scholarship opportunities are made available through the collaboration of the district and community and arts organizations.
"I live in a single-parent household; my mom worked as a secretary.
There was no money to send me to music camp," said an alumna, now a University of Miami music student, who once attended Interlochen on an Ann Arbor community scholarship.
"The camp experience left me in awe.
It pushed me to be a better person."
Community partnerships have also played a role in shaping better arts education ­ including visual arts, dance, and music.
In-school residencies, performances, and master classes engage students as active participants.
Meanwhile, frequent teacher workshops reinforce strategies for applying the arts throughout the curriculum.
Ann Arbor's music and arts teachers recently joined forces in the school district's "Arts and Technology" course, which allows students to explore careers in both areas.
G 39
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
A Profile:
ARLINGTON (VA) Factors The Community The School Board Parent/Public Relations An Elementary Foundation
dent performances, we enjoy community and professional performances, exhibits, and lectures."
ATLANTA'S BUSY "MAC" Atlanta Public Schools' Music Advisory Committee (MAC) is composed of 10 music teachers who represent K-12 instruction in general music, band, chorus, and orchestra proportionately.
They are invited to participate in the MAC by the district music coordinator.
Atlanta school leaders say that the group has opened communications by educating teachers in administrative procedures and limitations and providing them with a way to voice their concerns in a timely, appropriate, and effective fashion.
The MAC surveys staff for input on issues both small and large, including funding, staffing, and supplemental pay and brings those issues to their meetings.
The MAC discusses the issues and offers suggestions on how to make improvements.
The music coordinator takes these suggestions under advisement when developing proposals for the administration and the Board of Education.
The MAC has provided assistance in publishing a music teachers' handbook for the school system, providing specifications and installation priorities for new music technology, and recommending teachers for staff development.
It instituted free piano lessons for the district's employees, making the point that what is good for the students is good for their educators, too.
Statistics Schools (Total): 41 Students (Total): 17,568 Per Pupil: $9,330 Arts Teachers (Total): 104
G
A Profile:
T
ATLANTA (GA) Factors The School Board The Superintendent National, State, and Other Outside Forces Planning
he public school system of Arlington, Virginia, a suburb of Washington, D.C., educates one of the nation's most diverse and sophisticated student populations ­ 17,500 students from around the world speaking 53 different languages.
Students consistently score well above state and national averages on standardized tests.
The high school graduation rate is 92.5 percent.
The Arlington School Board, its chairman noted,"understands the benefits every student receives from the arts."
That understanding is clear throughout the Arlington school system, where the arts ­ music, visual arts, theater, and dance (included in the physical education curriculum) ­ are given full consideration as academic disciplines, complete with weekly instructional time of elementary students in music and the visual arts, certified specialists in each field, staff development opportunities, residencies, special-focus programs, and a comprehensive, sequential curriculum that more than meets national standards.
In addition, Arlington has formed numerous community-based and arts-organization partnerships.
The district has partnered with the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts in that institution's Performing Arts Centers and Schools program.
Just as schools have reported in this study that arts teachers who practice their art contribute to the quality of a district's arts education, school board members who are actively engaged with the arts on a personal or professional level bring something more to their jobs as well.
As a recent board chairperson, Mary Hynes, pointed out in an awards nomination letter, "School board members are also active artists.
Libby Garvey plays the piano and sings with a performing group; Diane Smith is a member of the board of the Arlington Arts Center, a professional gallery; I received my bachelor's degree in textiles.
All board members enjoy school arts events throughout the year.
In addition to supporting stu-
Statistics Schools (Total): 108 Students (Total): 60,208 Per Pupil: $7,188 Arts Teachers (Total): 219
The Atlanta Public Schools' board members value the arts, and, therefore, they fund the arts.
The Atlanta school district is one the few in this national study that includes a line item and discrete funds allocated specifically for arts education.
Funds specified for arts programs cannot be diverted to other disciplines.
School leaders believe that this approach helps protect arts programs from losses that could threaten basic needs.
In a district in which 80 percent of the students are considered poor, this strategy has been key to maintaining equal access to quality arts schooling.
In 1997-98, for example, the board allocated $1,000,000 beyond the budget request to refurbish band instruments.
District leaders have been equally diligent and creative in seeking support for the arts from Atlanta's business community and from unconventional sources as well.
For example, when the Georgia Legislature offered school districts a Special Local Option Sales Tax ­ a one cent sales tax for school construction and renovation ­ wheels started turning.
The superintendent assessed needs and presented his case to the community, including the need for equipment and space for music students.
The result was community approval to redirect these funds to instruction.
During 1997-98, fine arts programs received 2,600,000 new dollars to upgrade programs over three to five years.
Benjamin Canada, who is now superintendent of Portland, Oregon, public schools and an advisor to this study, served as superintendent of Atlanta from 1993 to 1998.
He made articulating the value of the arts to the community a fundamental part of his job.
The message was well received: Today Atlanta has the highest level of
new funding for arts education in more than five decades, a new magnet school for arts, science, and technology is underway, and national standards for arts education have been implemented.
G
A Profile:
BEAUFORT COUNTY (SC) Factors A Cadre of Principals Opportunities for Higher Levels of Achievement National, State, Other Outside Forces
Statistics Schools (Total): 19 Students (Total): 15,008 Per Pupil: $4,509 Arts Teachers (Total): 79
B
eaufort County Public Schools began advocating for arts education in 1989 when the district joined the Arts in the Basic Curriculum (ABC) Project (see Greenville, SC, case study).
In order for the district to join the statewide ABC effort, the necessary funding for it had to be approved by each individual
PAGE
40
school, which had responsibility for sitebased arts funding.
The choice to participate made by the Beaufort schools reflected the support of both school principals and the community.
What's more, although private sources have contributed generously to the arts education programs, the schools of Beaufort have chosen not to rely on this "soft money" to cover the district's payroll of nearly 80 arts specialists.
Instead, the nearly $60,000 in private funding raised by the community is used for "extras" ­ scholarships, arts festivals, and special projects.
The community's involvement with Beaufort County Public Schools includes partnerships with local arts organizations such as the Arts Council of Beaufort County and the Self-Family Arts Center.
The former education program director of the South Carolina Arts Commission, Jill Warzer, pointed out, "Every performing and presenting organization of note has initiated an educational outreach component which may be as diverse as providing artists and ensembles in the schools to funding scholarship initiatives."
act."
The mayor is a musician; the governor is a clarinetist.
The annual event is so important to the community ­ helping to define it and provide its cohesion ­ that a 30-member coordinating committee meets monthly to plan it.
to arts education programs in the face of tightened budgets with the help of community partnerships, parents' fund-raising efforts, and joint buying of arts materials.
G
ABOVE AVERAGE Counselors in each of the high schools in Boise, ID, reviewed the records of students involved in school activities.
They found that students who participated in the orchestra had grade point averages and attendance records higher than school averages.
A Profile:
CHARLOTTE MECKLENBURG (NC) Factors The Community National, State, Other Outside Forces Planning
Statistics Schools (Total): 130 Students (Total): 92,619 Per Pupil: $5,081 Arts Teachers (Total): 515
G
A Profile:
BOISE (ID) Factors The Community Continuity in Leadership
Statistics Schools (Total): 41 Students (Total): 26,680 Per Pupil: $4,719 Arts Teachers (Total): 185
O
nce a stop on the Chautauqua circuit, Boise is an example of a place where music took hold at the turn of the century and continues to play a vital role in the life of the community today.
Each year during the first week in May, this metropolitan community of approximately 250,000 people, "drops everything and makes music for itself," explained Larry Williams, coordinator of music in the Boise Schools.
"Music Week" in 1998 marked the 80th anniversary of this celebration ­ nine full days of music in the parks, churches, performance halls, and schools.
"It permeates all of our institutions at every level," Williams noted, "and everyone gets in on the
Boise Independent School District spends "upwards of 15 percent" of its $133 million general fund budget on the arts, including salaries, supplies, equipment, busing for special field trips and more.
This financial commitment supports a high quality instructional staff (11.5 percent, or 185 certified arts teachers, of the district's 1,600 teachers).
It provides for the space required for teaching classes in visual arts, musical arts, dance and movement, theater, and creative writing.
Boise also makes sure there is time for the arts: To promote rather than restrict student electives, Boise has seven-period days plus a "zero" period class opportunity at many of its secondary schools.
In addition, Boise schools make the most of the outreach programs of the area's arts organization such as the Idaho Academy of Dance, which offers a 10-week artist-in-residence program to four schools each semester.
F
G
A Profile:
BURLINGTON (WI) Factors The Community The School Board The Superintendent Planning
Statistics Schools (Total): 7 Students (Total): 3,529 Per Pupil: $6,082 Arts Teachers (Total): 24
T
he K-12 school district of Burlington, a town just north of the Wisconsin-Illinois state line that is known for its chocolate factory, serves some 3,500 students in seven schools.
A supportive school board and administration have managed to resist cuts
ifteen years ago, Charlotte-Mecklenburg, like other districts its size, faced many competing demands on its resources and offered limited arts education to its students.
Yet the community also had a number of strong arts advocates with a powerful vision of what the arts could do for students.
Their vision was grounded in the shared conviction that the arts play an important role in helping children to think critically and to find creative approaches in solving problems.
They believed, too, in the role the arts play in learning across the curriculum.
Bringing that vision to life, however, required a plan.
So the community's arts advocates, working with the school system's arts administration and the Arts 
A number of strategies and activities contributed to and helped shape the resulting plan.
A survey conducted by the consultants found "overwhelming" community support for the arts in education, including endorsement by 92 percent of respondents for additional classroom instruction in the arts.
As a result, school arts administrators and local artists began exploring options together.
They articulated a mission and goals statement with the aim of building a high-quality, comprehensive arts education program that would be nationally recognized within five years' time.
The Arts 
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
41
posed by the local arts group -- that designates arts education as a top priority.
The policy appropriates one-third of all new monies raised to support educational programs that directly benefit Charlotte-Mecklenburg youth.
At a time when public funding of the arts was an issue for debate, the Arts 
The Wolf Organization, meanwhile, began developing a 10-year plan designed to integrate arts in the
"The World of Oz" and Other "Great Ideas" in Charlotte-Mecklenburg In 1997, Charlotte-Mecklenburg Schools and the Cultural Education Collaborative of the Arts 
This literacy-based program connected social studies, math, communication, science, and the arts in an integrated approach to learning at all grade levels (K-12).
Together with sponsors First Union National Bank (which provided $100,000 support), the Charlotte City Center Partners, and 15 cultural, arts, and science organizations throughout the community, the Cultural Education Collaborative designed a year-long series of classroom activities, a curriculum guide, instructional plans (delivered via the Internet), and off-site education programs and performances for all Charlotte-Mecklenburg students.
School-based "World of Oz" units were aligned with the Charlotte-Mecklenburg Schools' Performance standards.
Twelve instructional activities featured an arts and science focus connected to other subject areas, and additional curriculum-based arts, cultural, and science programs were brought into the classroom throughout the year by artists, scientists, and affiliate organizations.
In the local community, special museum exhibitions and performances were offered, and a "yellow brick road" wound through Charlotte's uptown Cultural District.
The "Grants for Great Ideas" program rewards creative curricular thinking through the granting of funds ($25,000 annually) for new programs and teacher collaboration such as "The Rainbow Connection," which brings together elementary school arts teachers to create meaningful integrated units.
schools through the North Carolina Standard Course of Study.
The Arts 
In other words, a criteria for funding became a program's relevance to the goals set down in the state standards.
Also, multiple, interrelated experiences became the norm.
(See "The World of Oz.")
The Arts 
Additionally, the Council has supported the renovation of an arts facility devoted to arts education and the collaboration of the schools and community organizations.
Local businesses -- including national banks headquartered in Charlotte -- have rallied around arts education efforts as well.
The Education Foundation, which has received national recognition, provides grants to support new initiatives, such as the formation of a quintet of music teachers to perform in the system's schools.
In this way, the teachers are recognized as musicians as well as instructors.
Today Charlotte-Mecklenburg's long-range planning is manifest in each student's education.
Every elementary student in the district is now taught art and music every week by trained specialists.
The district's students also may look forward to the availability of Advanced Placement courses in the arts when they reach secondary school.
Carefully planned block scheduling has not only increased opportunities for offering new, specialized courses but also has afforded students a greater ability to enroll in programs of their choice.
At the high school level, the system as a whole is moving away from generalist arts courses into more specific content areas with higher expectations.
A Profile:
CHARLOTTESVILLE (VA) Factors The Community An Elementary Foundation Opportunities for Higher Levels of Achievement Continuous Improvement
Statistics Schools (Total): 9 Students (Total): 4,292 Per Pupil: $7,857 Arts Teachers (Total): 26
F
G
or more than two decades, the Charlottesville City Schools district has nurtured an environment for the growth of ever-stronger arts programs and ever-greater access to them.
Charlottesville City Schools' orchestra program, for example, has flourished since the early 1980s -- growing from eight to nearly 100 members, garnering state and national awards, playing at the White House and state conferences.
The choral and band programs also have won student participation and their share of awards.
The growth of these programs is the result of careful cultivation.
To interest fourth graders in a year-long fifth-grade arts course, Charlottesville City Schools created the Fine Arts Introduction and Recruitment Program.
Fine arts teachers go into each fourth-grade classroom, sometimes with older students, to describe their programs or give hands-on demonstrations of their instruments.
In addition, the Charlottesville and University Symphony Orchestra performs an annual "Young People's Concert" for all fourth graders on the grounds of the University of Virginia.
With the district's population representing a wide socio-economic range, Charlottesville City has made accessibility a major goal.
Over the years, Charlottesville City Schools has stockpiled some 200 good band instruments and 100 good orchestra instruments.
The district purchased these musical instruments with funds allocated in the budget.
Additionally, four or five instruments are donated each year.
Students are able to rent an instrument at $75 per year, with the fee going to the instrument repair budget.
According to Jeff Suling, the fine arts coordinator, "The fee tends to make the students take better care of the instruments."
For those who cannot afford the rental fee, the $75 is waived.
Similarly, the $10 fee for Charlottesville City Schools' visual arts program is waived for some students.
Ethnicity as well as economic need is a consideration in the school district, which attempts to pull students
PAGE
42
"IF YOU BUILD IT . . ."
"If you build it, they will come" is an axiom that does not necessarily hold true for an arts center.
All across America well-meaning arts leaders have built local and regional arts centers only to wonder where to find audiences to support them.
That, in part, is how many an "education outreach" program began to help build the next audience.
Then there are communities like Charlottesville, Virginia.
Charlottesville has a fine 1,276-seat Performing Arts Center in Charlottesville High School.
This is not the standard high school auditorium retrofitted for occasional concerts.
The Center was built with a separate entrance to provide the feeling of a separate performance venue.
The school districts' performing arts groups perform here, to be sure, but so do local, state, national and international performing arts groups, such as the Moscow Ballet.
The school district employs a full-time theater manager and assistant to run the theater day to day, separately from other school facilities, and charges for the use of the hall at different rates for various groups.
Everyone benefits, particularly the students.
The school system gains revenues, the students gain a great space to perform and display their talents, and the community gains a center for the arts as well as a tangible manifestation of the link between the arts and education, school and community, future artist and future audience.
A Profile:
CHELMSFORD (MA) Factors The Community The Superintendent A Cadre of Principals An Elementary Foundation Planning
Statistics Schools (Total): 7 Students (Total): 5,512 Per Pupil: $5,500 Arts Teachers (Total): 31
F
of all groups into the arts programs.
Charlottesville has found that while all ethnic groups take visual arts and vocal music, fewer minority students participate in instrumental music.
To gain their interest, teachers will visit music classes with minority students for a hands-on introduction to musical instruments to show their realness and accessibility.
In the visual arts, students are tested in fourth grade using the same set of criteria the district uses to identify students for its "gifted classes."
After a thorough judging process, those who show visual arts skills are offered the opportunity to participate in a fifth-grade program called ArtQuest.
Students meet weekly after school with art teachers and an artist in residence.
They develop goals, critique their own artwork, and maintain a portfolio.
The program focuses on creating art, learning new techniques, studying the art and art history of various cultures, and visiting museums and galleries.
The district cites two practices that have contributed to the success of this effort: (1) all art teachers are invited to participate, and (2) students are provided with transportation home.
G
or more than 25 years, the Chelmsford School District, approximately 50 miles northwest of Boston, has maintained strong arts education while struggling against state-level tax cuts and funding limitations.
Faced with extensive budget cuts a decade ago, Chelmsford was forced to take a comprehensive approach toward rebuilding its arts education programs.
After conducting a survey and reviewing existing programs, the district leaders developed a five-year, systemwide plan to make curriculum and schedule changes.
The district began to: · reinstate (after a five-year absence) weekly visual art classes in the elementary schools, in addition to weekly music and choir classes; · introduce dance classes for second graders with the help of an artistin-residence grant from the Massachusetts Cultural Council; · form small music groups of fourthgrade beginning students who meet once a week; · establish a new graduation requirement for all high school students to have 15 fine arts credits by the end of their senior year (beginning with the class of 2001); · add a high school-level course in theater.
At the middle school level, Chelmsford faced difficulties with arts scheduling.
To meet this challenge, block scheduling was instituted with arts schedules completely restructured into an arts block.
Instead of students being taken out of classes to go to music rehearsals, they now have these classes daily, along with other disciplines.
As a result, the middle school music programs witnessed a 50 percent increase in student participation and interest.
The changes have been supported by the community.
The Chelmsford Friends of Music organization, which has provided consistent financial and political support for arts education for many years, sponsors in-school artist visits and residencies, transportation to
arts venues, scholarship aid, and the purchase of instruments and band uniforms.
School councils and parentteacher organizations further supplement arts education needs.
A school board committed to backing arts initiatives has influenced the opinions of fellow board members, and both superintendent and principals have teamed to provide leadership in restructuring Chelmsford's arts education.
G
A Profile:
CHITTENDEN SOUTH (VT) Factors The Community Teachers Who Practice Their Art National, State, Other Outside Forces Continuous Improvement
Statistics Schools (Total): 6 Students (Total): 4,100 Per Pupil: $7,800 Arts Teachers (Total): 17
T
he school district of Chittenden South -- situated south of Vermont's largest city, Burlington -- comprises a number of independent towns in a largely rural setting.
A challenge to the continuity of arts programs and instruction is posed by the fact that each of the towns within the district is run by autonomous, separate, and independent school boards.
As a result, although the school district as a whole is making great strides toward proficiency in the arts, each individual town is approaching this goal at a different rate and through different methods.
Despite the challenges this complex arrangement presents, Chittenden South has set the goal of a comprehensive, sequential, and high-quality arts program for all of its students.
Placing equal emphasis on the value of music, art, theater, and dance, the district is working as a whole to see that each discipline is represented fully through a district-wide standards committee.
Arts educators throughout the district consult one another on student achievement in the context of the Vermont Framework standards document.
Many teachers use the arts in integrated units, both with and without assistance from arts instructors, and they collaborate among disciplines and schools.
Music teachers of small elementary schools meet regularly, share ideas, and even plan joint concerts.
The distance between sites in the district makes it difficult for students continued on next page
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
43
to establish relationships and friendships in other schools, so such opportunities are of special significance.
Instructors at the Charlotte Central School -- aware that past limitations of planning time with teachers and contact time with students curtailed diffusion of the arts among disciplines -- are participating in a multi-year collaboration between a local pottery artisan/parent and an art teacher that is designed to integrate art and social studies.
Many arts educators in the district have become leaders in the state, developing rubrics and benchmarks in a five-year, ongoing development of assessment techniques.
District arts teachers and students collaboratively share and critique student work online with artists and other districts through a statewide Web project with the Vermont Arts Council.
Student music compositions are digitized, artwork is scanned, and portfolios are retained electronically.
Student work is also displayed on school home pages.
G
A Profile:
CLEVELAND (OH) Factors The Community National, State, Other Outside Forces Planning
Statistics Schools (Total): 119 Students (Total): 74,026 Per Pupil: $7,151 Arts Teachers (Total): 257
O
ne of the most financially challenged school districts in the nation, Cleveland Public Schools, has succeeded in creating a strong and successful basis for arts education through the concerted effort of six local foundations.
According to Dr. Richard Boyd, who was serving as superintendent -- appointed by the state -- in 1995, the foundations decided to contribute to the systemic improvement of arts education in the schools rather than simply continue to help keep local arts groups viable.
The staff at one foundation questioned, for example, the efficacy of continuing to spend $50,000 a year to send all of the third grade children to a performance of the symphony once a year.
"How does that change kids in the long run?" they asked themselves.
To determine how best to use the foundations' resources, the six organizations came together and hired the Boston-based Wolf Organization to conduct a comprehensive study.
The consulting group identified and met with every agency in the county involved in the arts and ultimately recommended the creation of a committee of school district personnel and arts group leaders tasked with formulating the approach.
Meanwhile, with a salary subsidy from one of the foundations, one individual was hired to work in the school system and another to work with a coalition of cultural groups.
The objective: to explore how arts groups could work to meet the needs of the schools.
Visits to Chicago, Milwaukee, and other large school systems with successful arts/schools collaborations proved invaluable.
As part of this initiative, the Cleveland team established a link to the Web site of the Chicago Arts Partnership in Education (CAPE), and they now exchange lesson plans and best practices.
The resulting program supported by the six foundations is known as ICARE -- for "Initiative for Cultural Arts in Education."
It is administered by the Cleveland Cultural Coalition, which also raises funds from businesses and corporations.
ICARE's mission is to connect "the resources of the Greater Cleveland cultural community to the needs of the Cleveland Public Schools in a way that places arts and culture at the center of the school curriculum."
Of the 119 schools in the Cleveland system, a dozen are now engaged in 11 different partnerships established by this program.
The Cleveland Opera, the Cleveland Museum of Art, Young Audiences of Greater Cleveland, and the Cleveland Orchestra are just a few of the local groups that have helped create and integrate lesson plans in the schools.
To participate in the ICARE program, a school or an arts group must submit a proposal based upon a school's needs.
The cultural partner must make a minimum commitment of five years to the school.
Depending on the school's needs, ICARE provides funding for professional development for arts specialists and classroom teachers, the fees of artist/educators from outside the school, compensation for teacher and artist planning time, and materials for arts education projects.
ICARE has set forth eight expectations for individual school/cultural institution partnerships.
The partners are expected to commit to: 1.
a long-term relationship 2.
joint planning 3.
professional development for all participants 4.
identification of specific learning objectives of all disciplines 5.
development of engaging and participatory activities for students 6.
on-site and school-site programming 7.
integration of cultural experiences into the daily school curriculum 8.
accountability through program evaluation and student assessment To help partners meet expectations, ICARE supports professional development of teachers, artists, parents, and administrators.
ICARE offers a summer institute on curriculum development and a series of at least six workshops on partnership mechanics, student assessment, parent involvement and other areas relevant to arts education.
After two years of operation, program evaluations conducted by ICARE, the 12 schools, and the Wolf Organization showed improved attendance at partnership schools.
Test scores had improved at some sites.
And at one school, which services children with behavioral problems, both behavior and attendance have improved.
Expansion of the program to more schools is one clear goal.
Such expansion would require the full financial participation of the Cleveland school district, as well as the involvement of cultural institutions, artists, and parents, to ensure its success and long-term viability.
Changes in the governance of Cleveland Public Schools -- from state control to the city of Cleveland -- are likely to have an impact.
Also, the ICARE administrators note, as the Cleveland school district moves to site-based management, individual schools will receive more funds from the district.
This new money could help support arts education at those sites.
Given ICARE's school staff technical assistance in assessment, accountability, use of community resources and grant-writing, the skills should be in place to enable arts education to remain viable without complete dependency upon ICARE.
G
PAGE
44
A Profile:
A Profile:
CLOVIS (CA) Factors The Community The Superintendent National, State, Other Outside Forces
Statistics Schools (Total): 32 Students (Total): 30,627 Per Pupil: $4,084 Arts Teachers (Total): 359
COEUR D'ALENE 271 (ID) Factors The Community The Superintendent Continuity in Leadership An Elementary Foundation Opportunities for Higher Levels of Achievement
Statistics Schools (Total): 14 Students (Total): 8,770 Per Pupil: $4,121 Arts Teachers (Total): 34
T
he Clovis Unified School District is located in a growing suburb of Fresno, California, where change is occurring rapidly as new families move into the district known for its smalltown charm and good schools.
Arts education in Clovis schools has succeeded because of top-down support.
"My goal is to have every students involved in the arts every day," says Dr. Walter L. Buster, superintendent.
His interest is to focus on a student's need for a well-rounded education of mind, body, and spirit.
A well-rounded education includes study of the arts.
One of the district's schools, Valley Oak Elementary, is participating in the Transforming Education Through the Arts Challenge, supported by the Getty Education Institute for the Arts and the Annenberg Foundation.
Valley Oak is one of 36 schools throughout the country that are participating in the Challenge.
During the first year, teachers at the school learned about the Discipline-Based Arts Education (DBAE) method of teaching the arts and have begun integrating the arts across other subjects.
This one school's involvement is helping other schools to learn about the whole school change model through district-wide workshops.
Among the many ways the community supports arts in the schools is the Clovis Arts Docent program, which sends parents and volunteers to visit classrooms weekly to discuss and share history and research about works of art.
The program, in existence for more than 15 years, involves training by art teachers, and sometimes participation in DBAE classes.
A
G
resort community overlooking a lake of the same name, Coeur d'Alene boomed as a center for logging and mining during the 1880s.
In the 1990s, it has been building a forwardlooking, technology-integrated program of arts education that is firmly rooted in a century-old tradition of support.
Coeur d'Alene's arts programs have benefited greatly from a remarkable continuity of staffing.
Two typical examples are the current high school band director -- only the third since the late 1920s -- and an instructor in the high school art program who only recently retired after 26 years of service.
Vocal and elementary music teachers have been added to the faculty over many years, and the district achieved full-time, elementary through high school music coverage in 1986.
The high quality of instruction in Coeur d'Alene has been recognized at the local, state, and national levels through numerous awards and invitations to staff to participate in special training opportunities.
Dr. David Rawls, superintendent, believes that arts programs must be available to all children beginning at an early age.
He also supports ongoing arts education for all, as well as deeper, broader, and more comprehensive opportunities for students as their skills and talents develop.
In Coeur d'Alene, all elementary students take regularly scheduled art and music classes, and services are also provided to pre-school and special education students.
Special choruses are offered to fourth and fifth graders who wish to gain additional singing experience, and all sixth graders are exposed to music and art in a series of "exploratory" classes.
At the seventhgrade and high school levels, art and music become elective classes (drama becomes an elective at the high school level), while some music classes are open to any student who registers and others are open by audition.
In addition to traditional areas of the arts curriculum -- visual arts, music, creative writing, theater and dance -- video production and graphic design are offered at the middle and high school levels, and specialized visual arts instruction at the elementary level.
Integration of the arts curriculum into other content areas is encouraged, particularly at the elementary level, and each school designates a line item for arts education in its respective budget.
Curriculum guides were developed to involve not just staff and administrators in arts education, but also members of the community.
Community partnerships are abundant at both the local (Citizens' Council for the Arts) and state (Idaho Commission on the Arts) levels.
Through active advocacy efforts, grants have been received for artist residencies, innovative programs, musical instruments, curriculum materials, choir robes, and technology equipment.
Local businesses donate materials that would otherwise be discarded to the visual arts program: flooring companies donate discarded tile; printing companies donate cut paper, and interior designers give fabric and wallpaper samples.
Parent volunteers assist in the classrooms or with special projects, and they are often the initiators of fund raisers and other awareness-building projects.
The introduction of technology provides the district with an opportunity to explore skills necessary for many arts-based careers.
Through partnerships with Adobe and Macromedia, teachers have learned to use new resources, expanding their own teaching to include technology.
This effort has been so successful that individual Coeur d'Alene instructors have been selected as Northwest Technology Teacher of the Year.
Teacher Mike Clabby directed an American history class at Lakes Middle School through a year-long project culminating in the production of a CD-ROM.
Using the advanced software Director and SoundEdit 15, he broke the class into small teams and led students acting as writers, artists, research directors and project directors to design segments focusing on topics ranging from slavery to the U.S. government.
G 45
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
A Profile:
A Profile:
COLUMBUS (NE) Factors The Community The School Board District Arts Coordinator(s) National, State, Other Outside Forces
CSD #3 (NY, NY) Factors The Community An Elementary Foundation Opportunities for Higher Levels of Achievement National, State, Other Outside Forces Continuous Improvement
Statistics Schools (Total): 10 Students (Total): 3,538 Per Pupil: $4,855 Arts Teachers (Total): 17
Statistics Schools (Total): 37 Students (Total): 15,000 Per Pupil: $7,863 Arts Teachers (Total): 165
ue over time.
Moreover, there must be a willingness to constantly evaluate the goals and outcomes of the program and to work toward positive change and program effectiveness.
The challenge for CSD #3, the district's leadership points out, is in institutionalizing these partnerships and making them part of the fabric of teaching and learning in this Upper
C
olumbus, NE, is a small rural town approximately 70 miles west of Omaha.
The Columbus Public Schools implemented a Discipline-Based Arts Education program more than a decade ago.
Ann Masters, Nebraska Department of Education, recommended the district for this study: · Because of Columbus' involvement [with DBAE] on a national level, secondary art educator Jean Detlefsen has served on the National Board of Professional Teaching Standards Setting Committee and has coordinated Nebraska's K-12 Visual and Performing Arts Curriculum Frameworks Project that was funded by the U.S. Department of Education, Office of Innovation.
· Columbus continues to be interested in excellence in arts education as they begin their work to ensure that all high school students receive visual arts education through integrating the visual arts into history, language arts, and foreign language classes.
This curriculum program is supported by an Annenberg-Getty Arts Partnership award which provides staff development, technical assistance, and materials to 36 school buildings in the nation.
E
Columbus Public Schools' experiences with Discipline-Based Arts Education are documented in Brent Wilson's The Quiet Evolution: Changing the Face of Arts Education (1997), published by the Getty Education Institute for the Arts.
G
ven after New York City cut all of its school arts programs in the early 1970s, Community School District #3 (CSD #3) on Manhattan's Upper West Side has succeeded in keeping the arts alive in its schools.
The concerted fund raising efforts of district parents has been one major factor.
Another is the building of strong, enduring partnerships with arts organizations and institutions.
From its broad and deep experience with partnerships, CSD #3 offers valuable lessons in how to develop and manage external arts education resources.
Particularly instructive are the district's expectations of both the schools and the participating institutions.
"We demand a great deal more from these institutions than a short prepackaged residency program that comes and goes within a period of weeks and offers little more than an enrichment experience to our students and their teachers," Shelly Alpert, CSD #3 director of cultural arts wrote in the district's report for this study.
She elaborated: · CSD #3 insists upon ongoing professional development for our pedagogical staff; workshops for parents, and an ongoing and long-term teaching artist presence in the school (20 weeks or more).
We expect our classroom teachers to become educated in the residency discipline and to take responsibility for teaching, planning, program implementation, and integration into other subject areas.
If a classroom teacher is working with a performance-based program, s/he is also responsible for attendance at performances and exhibits both in school and at the cultural institution on an ongoing basis.
We have learned that all members of the school community, including the principal, who are afforded the privilege of working with a particular institution, must make a commitment of time, energy, and willingness to be educated in order for the program to be effective and to contin-
PARTNERS APLENTY Community School District #3 has established partnerships with these institutions and organizations, among others.
Funding for the partnerships is provided by a range of sources, including grants obtained by the school district or by the partnering organization.
Carnegie Hall (Schools Partnership LINK-UP! Program) CUNY Graduate Center 42nd Street Fund Lincoln Center Institute Metropolitan Opera Guild (Creating Original Opera Program) Museum of Modern Art (Visual Thinking Curriculum, or VTC) Music for the World Foundation New York Philharmonic Studio in a School Teachers College, Columbia University (including the Creative Arts Laboratory, or CAL) Artists in residencies, which also are funded in many different ways, have included: Alvin Ailey Dance Company American Ballroom Dance Institute Arts Horizons Ballet Hispanic Bloomingdale House of Music Blue Heron Theater Chamber Music Society of Lincoln Center Children's Art Carnival City Center Elaine Kaufman Cultural Center L.E.A.P.
Metropolitan Museum of Art Midori Foundation Residencies National Dance Institute New York City Ballet 92nd Street Y Chamber Symphony Studio Museum in Harlem Symphony Space C.A.P.
Teachers and Writers Collaborative Western Wind Vocal Ensemble Young Audiences of New York
PAGE
46
West Side community.
The many arts partnership initiatives of the district are supported by the school board, which has consistently approved budgets with major funding for the partnerships, for the district's arts-based schools (The Centre School, Wadleigh Alternative Arts Middle School, School for Writing and Publishing, West Side Academy Middle School, and the Special Music School of America), and for salaries for a full-time arts coordinator and arts staff developer.
Community Superintendent Patricia A. Romandetto also supports the arts education programs and would like to see the district's schools use the arts as a tool for restructuring.
Parents, meanwhile, demonstrate their support through countless fund raisers and vigorous advocacy.
Alpert points out that even in New York City, as in so many districts across the country, "It is often parental pressure that has persuaded the district to fund full-time positions in the arts."
G
A Profile:
EAST STROUDSBURG (PA) Factors The Community The School Board An Elementary Foundation Continuous Improvement
Statistics Schools (Total): 7 Students (Total): 6,164 Per Pupil: $5,096 Arts Teachers (Total): 35
N
estled in the Pocono Mountains, East Stroudsburg Area School District provides a sequentially developed foundation in basic arts education at the elementary level and offers electives and activities in the visual arts, music, and drama from grades 8 through 12.
With this firm base and the school board's continuing financial support of the arts programs, the district is fertile ground for pilot progams in arts education.
One such program began six or seven years ago under the guidance of Resica Elementary School principal Greg Naudascher and Becky Gorton, an early childhood educator at Northampton Area Community College.
Their schools formed one of 12 core teams in "Arts as a Way of Learning," a national training program developed by Binney 
enhance educators' efforts to integrate the arts across the curriculum.
Located in nearby Easton, Binney 
One good collaboration led to another, which was launched two years ago.
The second partnership -- between Resica and East Stroudsburg University -- was initiated by Naudascher and Dr. Patricia Pinciotti, a professor of education whose grantwriting efforts resulted in funding from Heinz.
This collaboration's focus is ongoing staff development to give the district's arts specialists and classroom teachers a knowledge base in arts and integration strategies.
Additionally, that collaboration has led a project to build students' inquiry skills.
At the start of the year, the elementary students from Resica and college students from East Stroudsburg University visit the Allentown Art Museum.
The purpose of the museum visit, Greg Naudascher explains, "is for the students to learn how to really look at a piece of art, to interpret a work in a systematic way and respond in a journal in words and pictures.
Later, we will use this journal to look at a piece of art and tie what we've observed into curricular themes, say Turner's work if the theme is oceans.
In the spring, we plan to return to an art museum -- to the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York -- which will give the students an opportunity to use the inquiry skills they've developed over the year."
East Stroudsburg Area School District has a consistent curriculum for the school system, but each school has the freedom to determine how to deliver it.
The effects of Resica's explorations in arts-based learning are beginning to be seen elsewhere in the district.
Says Naudascher, "We've chosen to look at the arts as an important part of what we do at Resica.
We are seeing a ripple effect elsewhere in the district.
One thing that's occurring is that Howard Gardner's theory of multiple intelligences is pervading our schools.
So more and more administrators and teachers are seeing how the arts dovetail with that, and they are looking at how to make the arts work in their classrooms and schools."
A Profile:
EL DORADO #15 (AR) Factors The Community Continuity in Leadership
Statistics Schools (Total): 9 Students (Total): 4,800 Per Pupil: $4,021 Arts Teachers (Total): 20
T
G
he El Dorado School System has a tradition of excellence in the arts that spans more than 50 years.
The music program holds the record for longevity.
A trophy case in the high school gymnasium displays awards won by district musical groups dating back to 1928.
El Dorado was one of the first school systems in the state to recognize the importance of having certified music specialists to teach music classes to elementary students.
"Having this very important foundation," the district reports, "is one of the factors in the development of outstanding programs in the secondary schools."
In addition to its leadership in hiring, the district was the first, and for many years the only, school system in the state to offer orchestra instruction as part of the curriculum.
The string program was instituted in the late 1950s at about the same time a community orchestra was formed.
El Dorado Schools' Thespian Troupe No. 42, granted a charter in 1936, is active today as it draws upon students in grades 9 - 12 who have the opportunity to take Drama I, II, III, and IV.
A fully equipped "Little Theater" on the high school campus facilitates student-produced theater works.
Each semester the students produce a play which they present to the district's elementary and secondary schools as well as other area high schools.
Students also participate in individual competitions at the regional and state level.
Although much of the art activity at the elementary level is the work of the classroom teachers, El Dorado has a certified arts specialist who works with children in special arts projects.
Classes in the middle and high schools are taught by certified art teachers.
The district allocates 3 percent of its budget to arts education and provides designated music classrooms in each elementary school, ensemble rehearsal rooms in each secondary school, arts rooms in each middle school, and two art rooms in the high school.
continued on next page
Lessons From School Districts That Value
ARTS EDUCATION
PAGE
47
The community, which has supported arts education in the district through ongoing advocacy and arts organization partnerships, recently institutionalized its support when a group of citizens established an educational endowment.
In creating the endowment, which is dedicated to funding innovative programs beyond the scope of the district's financial resources, the founders stated their belief that the fine arts are core subjects.
G
A Profile:
ELMIRA (NY) Factors The Community Continuity in Leadership An Elementary Foundation
Statistics Schools (Total): 13 Students (Total): 8,270 Per Pupil: $4,758 Arts Teachers (Total): 51
L
ocated in New York's Finger Lakes region not far from the Pennsylvania border, Elmira is the state's 16th largest school district, serving more than 8,200 students in 13 schools.
Although Elmira's economy took a downturn in the 1980s with the loss of manufacturing jobs, the city is making a comeback with recent employment growth.
Elmira has a strong history of fine arts and boasts a program in place for more than half a century.
The breadth and depth of the district's fine arts program are rare among small city school districts.
It provides a wide range of courses including instrumental and vocal music opportunities and advanced electives in sculpture, oil painting, photography, and ceramics.
In a district with 49 percent of its students receiving free or reduced meals, elective enrollment ranges from 43 to 77 percent of eligible students.
Elmira's school leaders seek a balanced curriculum of academics, aesthetics, and athletics, believing that an appreciation of culture and the arts is essential to the education of the whole person.
Their aim is to establish the arts within a cultural and historical context that conveys both the distinct nature of each art form and the interrelationships among art forms.
The district has developed two arts programs with different purposes: (1) core curricular arts education and (2) arts integration.
The purpose of the art and music "core" is "sequential development of student art/music knowledge, skills, and attitudes K-12."
The distinguishing characteristics of this program include a focus on the production of art, providing a dedicated classroom space and time, as well as high expectations in student performance and production.
The "integrated arts" program focuses more on exposure and opportunity for multidisciplinary learning in a project-focused environment.
An example of the integratedarts program is the whole-school program at Coburn Elementary School, which serves 850 pre-kindergarten to sixth-grade students.
Its integrated arts program provides classes in grades 2 to 6 with two artists in residence, one in the fall and one in the spring.
Each artist has expertise in a culture or time period being studied in the social studies curriculum of that grade level.
The aim is also to integrate science, mathematics, and language arts into the unit.
For example, third-grade students studying Africa with a resident artist over a period of two or three weeks learn different dances for planting, weddings, and hunting.
Classroom activities also focus on learning about African languages, economics, costumes, and government.
Students have an opportunity to demonstrate their knowledge by exhibiting their work and performing in a song-and-dance festival for parents, peers, and community representatives.
Coburn's program has received additional funding from the Arts of the Southern Finger Lakes and the New York State Council of the Arts.
The program serves as a model for the other eight elementary schools in the district and has been recognized statewide as an exemplary program.
The Elmira School District also provides opportunities for students to participate in summer arts programs.
The Integrated Arts Summer Experience for third graders serves as an immersion experience with a special focus on beginning musical instruments.
The children also study theater, dance, visual arts, and vocal music in this program, which runs daily, three hours a day for six weeks.
A Profile:
FAIRFAX COUNTY (VA) Factors The Community The School Board Planning
Statistics Schools (Total): 239 Students (Total): 149,830 Per Pupil: $7,451 Arts Teachers (Total): 771
F
G
airfax County Public Schools (FCPS) serves a sprawling suburban region of Virginia across the Potomac River from Washington, D.C.
Once a largely rural area, the county began expanding rapidly in the early 1970s and 1980s as new business and commercial centers located within its boundaries.
These changes brought increased wealth and growth to schools and school programs (including arts education programs).
But as the growth slowed in the late 1980s and early 1990s, school budgets became political as well as fiscal issues.
The district is in the fortunate position of having substantial and well-organized community support for arts education, as well as a highly diverse population that generally recognizes the significance of the arts to education.
Fairfax County students originate from more than 150 countries and speak more than 100 different languages and dialects.
Some 93 percent of the district's graduates go on to college.
Fairfax County Public Schools' commitment to the arts began in 1964 when the district implemented band in grades 5 through 12.
String programs in grades 4 through 12 followed, and choral programs have been in place since the 1950s.
Elementary general music began in the 1960s, and theater arts came into their own when separated from English programs in a self-sustaining department.
Beginning in 1985, a new emphasis was placed on arts education, resulting in a significant increase in course offerings, staffing, and student enrollment.
In 1991, the district's Fine Arts Office, allying itself with a number of community leaders, stated the need for a "clear vision for the arts, a common agenda."
A public-private partnership -- the Fairfax Arts Coalition for Education (FACE) --was formed to spearhead an advocacy effort.
Composed of parents, teachers, students, business leaders, arts organizations, and other members of the community, FACE meets regularly to further a proactive arts agenda for the
PAGE
48
schools.
The heightened awareness which the organization promotes was critical to curtailing cuts to arts budgets when the school system faced across-the-board cutbacks during 199193.
The successes of FACE have been attributed in part to the fact that the group has represented a philosophy of arts education as opposed to individual programs or instructors.
Therefore, decisions beneficial to the entire community of children have been arrived at more easily.
The agenda and calendar of FACE are set to impact the budgetary decisions of both the Fairfax County School Board and Board of Supervisors, a strategy that has proved effective on a regular basis.
Each year from 1992 through 1997, the elimination of the fourth-grade strings program was slotted as a budget reduction.
In the wake of FACE's campaign of letters, faxes, e-mails, telephone calls, and public advocacy appearances, the proposed
